THE  NATIONAL  NANOTECHNOLOGY
INITIATIVE:  REVIEW  AND  OUTLOOK

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH
COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MAY  18,  2005

Serial No. 109–15

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

21–195PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE

HON.  SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York,  Chairman
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee
JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
LINCOLN  DAVIS,  Tennessee
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
SHEILA  JACKSON  LEE,  Texas
BRAD  SHERMAN,  California
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
JIM  COSTA,  California
AL  GREEN,  Texas
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
VACANCY

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
WAYNE  T.  GILCHREST,  Maryland
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
J.  RANDY  FORBES,  Virginia
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
JOHN  J.H.  ‘‘JOE’’  SCHWARZ,  Michigan
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina,  Chairman

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
CURT  WELDON,  Pennsylvania
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
GIL  GUTKNECHT,  Minnesota
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TIMOTHY  V.  JOHNSON,  Illinois
DAVE  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  E.  SODREL,  Indiana
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
VACANCY
SHERWOOD  L.  BOEHLERT,  New  York

DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
VACANCY
VACANCY
VACANCY

BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

DAN  BYERS  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

JIM  WILSON  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

ELIZABETH  GROSSMAN,  KARA  HAAS  Professional  Staff  Members

JAMES  HAGUE  Staff  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

May  18,  2005

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bob  Inglis,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search, Committee on Science, U.S. House of Representatives ........................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Darlene  Hooley,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Rep-
resentatives ...........................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Eddie Bernice Johnson, Member, Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Michael  M.  Honda,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Russ  Carnahan,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Research,  Committee  on  Science,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives .......................................................................................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  Scott  C.  Donnelly,  Senior  Vice  President  for  Global  Research;  Chief

Technology Officer, General Electric

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Dr.  John  M.  Kennedy,  Director,  Center  for  Advanced  Engineering  Fibers

and Films, Clemson University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Dr.  John  M.  Cassady,  Vice  President  for  Research,  Oregon  State  University
Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Mr.  Michael  Fancher,  Director  of  Economic  Outreach,  Associate  Professor

of Nanoeconomics, Albany Nanotech

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

11
12

12
13

15

15

16

16
19
20
21

22
23
30

31
33
38
39

39
42
48
49
50

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Dr.  John  M.  Cassady,  Vice  President  for  Research,  Oregon  State  University

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement of Bob Gregg, Executive Vice President, FEI Company ....................
The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  at  Five  Years:  Assessment  and  Rec-
ommendations  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory  Panel,  President’s
Council of Advisors on Science and Technology, May 2005 ..............................

Page
66

68

70

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  NATIONAL  NANOTECHNOLOGY
INITIATIVE:  REVIEW  AND  OUTLOOK

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  18,  2005

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:10  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. Bob Inglis [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The National Nanotechnology
Initiative: Review and Outlook

WEDNESDAY, MAY 18, 2005

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

On  Wednesday,  May  18,  2005,  the  Research  Subcommittee  of  the  Committee  on
Science  of  the  House  of  Representatives  will  hold  a  hearing  to  review  the  activities
of the National Nanotechnology Initiative (NNI).
2. Witnesses
Mr.  Scott  Donnelly  is  the  Senior  Vice  President  for  Global  Research  for  the  Gen-
eral Electric Company.
Dr. John Kennedy is Director of the Center for Advanced Engineering Fibers and
Films  (CAEFF)  at  Clemson  University.  CAEFF  is  a  National  Science  Foundation-
supported Engineering Research Center.
Dr.  John  Cassady  is  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Oregon  State  University
(OSU).  OSU  plays  a  leading  role  in  the  Oregon  Nanoscience  and  Microtechnologies
Institute.
Mr.  Michael  Fancher  is  Director  of  Economic  Outreach  at  Albany  NanoTech.  He
is  also  Associate  Professor  of  Nanoeconomics  at  the  State  University  of  New  York
at Albany, College of Nanoscale Science and Engineering.

3. Overarching Questions

• Which fields of science and engineering present the greatest opportunities for
breakthroughs  in  nanotechnology,  and  which  industries  are  most  likely  to  be
altered  by  those  breakthroughs  in  both  the  near-term  and  the  longer-term?
• What  are  the  primary  barriers  to  commercialization  of  nanotechnology,  and
how can these barriers be overcome or removed? What is the Federal Govern-
ment’s  role  in  facilitating  the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology  innova-
tions,  and  how  can  the  current  federal  nanotechnology  program  be  strength-
ened in this area?
• What  is  the  workforce  outlook  for  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  Federal
Government  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with
the  relevant  skills  to  meet  the  Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research
and  development  and  for  the  manufacture  of  nanotechnology-enabled  prod-
ucts?

4. Brief Overview

• In  December  2003,  the  President  signed  the  21st  Century  National
Nanotechnology  Research  and  Development  Act  (P.L.  108–153),  which  origi-
nated in the Science Committee. This Act provided a statutory framework for
the  interagency  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  (NNI),  authorized  appro-
priations  for  nanotechnology  research  and  development  (R&D)  activities
through fiscal year 2008 (FY08), and enhanced the coordination and oversight
of  the  program.  Funding  for  the  NNI  has  grown  from  $464  million  in  fiscal
year  2001  (FY01)  to  $1.1  billion  in  FY05,  and  11  agencies  currently  have
nanotechnology R&D programs.
• In  addition  to  federal  investments,  State  governments  and  the  private  sector
have become increasingly involved in supporting nanotechnology. In 2004, the
private  sector  in  the  U.S.  invested  roughly  $2  billion  in  nanotechnology  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

search,  while  states  invested  roughly  $400  million.  The  state  investment  is
primarily  spent  on  infrastructure  and  research  at  public  universities,  while
the private funding focuses on applied research and development activities at
small and large companies, and funding for start-up nanotechnology ventures.
• The 21st Century National Nanotechnology Research and Development Act re-
quired that a National Nanotechnology Advisory Panel (NNAP) biennially re-
port  to  Congress  on  trends  and  developments  in  nanotechnology  science  and
engineering  and  on  recommendations  for  improving  the  NNI.  The  first  such
report will be released on May 18. Its recommendations include strengthening
Federal-industry  and  Federal-State  cooperation  on  nanotechnology  research,
infrastructure,  and  technology  transfer,  and  broadening  federal  efforts  in
nanotechnology education and workforce preparation.

5. Background
Overview of Nanotechnology

The National Academy of Sciences describes nanotechnology as the ‘‘ability to ma-
nipulate  and  characterize  matter  at  the  level  of  single  atoms  and  small  groups  of
atoms.’’  An  Academy  report  describes  how  ‘‘small  numbers  of  atoms  or  mol-
ecules. . .often  have  properties  (such  as  strength,  electrical  resistivity,  electrical
conductivity,  and  optical  absorption)  that  are  significantly  different  from  the  prop-
erties of the same matter at either the single-molecule scale or the bulk scale.’’ Sci-
entists and engineers anticipate that nanotechnology will lead to ‘‘materials and sys-
tems with dramatic new properties relevant to virtually every sector of the economy,
such  as  medicine,  telecommunications,  and  computers,  and  to  areas  of  national  in-
terest such as homeland security.’’ 1

Nanotechnology is an enabling technology and, as such, its commercialization does
not depend specifically on the creation of new products and new markets. Gains can
come from incorporating nanotechnology into existing products, resulting in new and
improved versions of these products. Examples could include faster computers, light-
er materials for aircraft, less invasive ways to treat cancer, and more efficient ways
to  store  and  transport  electricity.  Some  less-revolutionary  nanotechnology-enabled
products are already on the market, including stain-resistant wrinkle-free pants, ul-
traviolet-light  blocking  sun  screens,  and  scratch-free  coatings  for  eyeglasses  and
windows.

In October 2004, a private research firm released its most recent evaluation of the
potential  impact  of  nanotechnology.  The  analysis  found  that,  in  2004,  $13  billion
worth  of  products  in  the  global  marketplace  incorporated  nanotechnology.  The  re-
port projected that, by 2014, this figure will rise to $2.6 trillion—15 percent of man-
ufacturing  output  in  that  year.  The  report  also  predicts  that  in  2014,  ten  million
manufacturing jobs worldwide—11 percent of total manufacturing jobs—will involve
manufacturing these nanotechnology-enabled products.2
National Nanotechnology Initiative

The National Nanotechnology Initiative (NNI) is a multi-agency research and de-
velopment  (R&D)  program.  The  goals  of  the  NNI,  which  was  initiated  in  2000,  are
to  maintain  a  world-class  research  and  development  program;  to  facilitate  tech-
nology transfer; to develop educational resources, a skilled workforce, and the infra-
structure  and  tools  to  support  the  advancement  of  nanotechnology;  and  to  support
responsible development of nanotechnology. Currently, 11 federal agencies have on-
going  programs  in  nanotechnology  R&D;  funding  for  those  activities  is  shown  in
Table 1. Additionally, 11 other agencies, such as the Food and Drug Administration,
the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, and the Department of Transportation, par-
ticipate in the coordination and planning work associated with the NNI.

1 Small  Wonders,  Endless  Frontiers:  A  Review  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative,  Na-

tional Research Council/National Academy of Sciences, 2002.

2 Lux Research, ‘‘Sizing Nanotechnology’s Value Chain,’’ October 2004.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

In 2003, the Science Committee wrote and held hearings on the 21st Century Na-
tional Nanotechnology Research and Development Act, which was signed into law on
December  3,  2003.  The  Act  authorizes  $3.7  billion  over  four  years  (FY05  to  FY08)
for  five  agencies  (the  National  Science  Foundation,  the  Department  of  Energy,  the
National  Institute  of  Standards  and  Technology,  the  National  Aeronautics  and
Space  Administration,  and  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency).  The  Act  also:
adds oversight mechanisms—an interagency committee, annual reports to congress,
an advisory committee, and external reviews—to provide for planning, management,
and coordination of the program; encourages partnerships between academia and in-
dustry;  encourages  expanded  nanotechnology  research  and  education  and  training
programs; and emphasizes the importance of research into societal concerns related
to nanotechnology to understand the impact of new products on health and the envi-
ronment.
National Nanotechnology Advisory Panel Report

The  21st  Century  National  Nanotechnology  Research  and  Development  Act  re-
quired  the  establishment  or  designation  of  a  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory
Panel (NNAP) to assess and provide advice on the NNI. In July 2004, the President
designated  the  existing  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology
to  serve  as  the  NNAP.  The  NNAP’s  responsibilities  include  providing  input  to  the
administration  on  trends  and  developments  in  nanotechnology  and  on  the  conduct
and management of the NNI.

The NNAP is required to report to Congress on its activities every two years, and
its  first  report  will  be  formally  released  on  May  18,  2005.  (Its  content  is  described
below.)  The  report  assesses  the  U.S.  position  in  nanotechnology  relative  to  the  rest
of  the  world,  evaluates  the  quality  of  current  NNI  programs  and  program  manage-
ment, and recommends ways the NNI could be improved.

Benchmarking

The  NNAP  report  finds  that  U.S.  leads  the  rest  of  the  world  in  nanotechnology
as measured by metrics such as level of spending (both public and private), publica-
tions  in  high-impact  journals,  and  patents.  The  report  also  finds,  however,  that
other  countries  are  increasing  their  efforts  and  investments  in  nanotechnology  and
are closing the gap with the U.S. Some countries cannot afford to invest as broadly
as  the  U.S.,  which  has  supported  nanotechnology  efforts  relevant  to  a  wide  range
of  industries,  but  these  other  countries—particularly  in  Asia—have  instead  chosen
to  concentrate  their  investments  in  particular  areas  to  make  strides  in  a  specific
sector.  For  example,  Korea  and  Taiwan  are  investing  heavily  in  nanoelectronics
while  Singapore  and  China  are  focusing  on  nanobiotechnology  and  nanomaterials,
respectively.

NNI Management

The  NNAP  report  finds  that  the  NNI  is  a  well  managed  program.  The  report
notes that the balance of funding among different areas of nanotechnology is appro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

priate  and  emphasizes  the  importance  of  investment  in  a  diverse  array  of  fields
rather  than  a  narrow  focus  on  a  just  a  few  ‘‘Grand  Challenges.’’  In  particular,  the
NNAP  lauds  the  NNI  for  advancing  the  foundational  knowledge  about  control  of
matter at the nanoscale; creating an interdisciplinary nanotechnology research com-
munity and an infrastructure of over 35 nanotechnology research centers, networks,
and  user  facilities;  investing  in  research  related  to  the  environment,  health,  safety,
and  other  societal  concerns;  establishing  nanotechnology  education  programs;  and
supporting public outreach.

Recommendations

The  NNAP  recommends  continued  strong  investment  in  basic  research  and  notes
the importance of recent federal investment in research centers, equipment, and fa-
cilities at universities and national laboratories throughout the country (see Appen-
dix  A).  Such  facilities  allow  both  university  researchers  and  small  companies  to
have access to equipment too expensive or unwieldy to be contained in an individual
laboratory.

The  NNAP  also  emphasizes  the  importance  of  State  and  industry  contributions
to  the  U.S.  nanotechnology  efforts  and  recommends  that  the  NNI  expand  federal-
state and federal-industry interactions through workshops and other methods.

The  NNAP  also  recommends  that  the  Federal  Government  actively  use  existing
government  programs  such  as  the  Small  Business  Innovation  Research  (SBIR)  and
the  Small  Business  Technology  Transfer  (STTR)  programs  to  enhance  technology
transfer  in  nanotechnology.  All  grant-giving  agencies  are  required  by  law  to  have
SBIR and STTR programs, and some of them specifically target solicitations toward
nanotechnology.  However,  it  is  hard  to  get  a  clear,  up-to-date  picture  of  how  much
funding  is  actually  provided  for  nanotechnology-related  projects  in  these  programs
and  on  what  the  demand  for  SBIR/STTR  funding  in  this  area  is.  The  NNAP  also
recommends  that  federal  agencies  be  early  adopters  and  purchasers  of  new
nanotechnology-related  products  in  cases  where  these  technologies  can  help  fulfill
an agency’s mission.

The NNAP also finds that the NNI is making good investments in environmental,
health, and safety research, and recommends that the Federal Government continue
efforts  to  coordinate  this  work  with  related  efforts  in  industry  and  at  non-profits
and  with  activities  conducted  in  other  countries.  The  NNAP  emphasizes  the  impor-
tance  of  communication  with  stakeholders  and  the  public  regarding  research  and
findings in this area.

Finally, the NNAP emphasizes the importance of education and workforce prepa-
ration  and  recommends  that  the  NNI  coordinate  with  Departments  of  Education
and Labor to improve access to materials and methods being developed for purposes
of nanotechnology education and training.
Challenges Ahead

The NNAP notes that successful adoption of nanotechnology-enabled products will
require  coordination  between  federal,  State,  academic,  and  industrials  efforts  (in-
cluding for efficient commercialization of products), training of a suitable high-tech-
nology  workforce,  and  development  of  techniques  for  the  responsible  manufacture
and use of these products.

Developing  a  federal  strategy  to  facilitate  technology  transfer  of  nanotechnology
innovations  is  a  particularly  complex  challenge  because  of  the  wide  range  of  indus-
try  sectors  that  stand  to  benefit  from  nanotechnology  and  the  range  of  time  scales
at which each sector will realize these benefits. The NNAP report provides examples
of various possible nanotechnology applications and when they are expected to reach
the  product  stage  (Table  2).  The  applications  cover  sectors  from  information  tech-
nology  and  health  care  to  security  and  energy,  and  some  applications  are  on  the
market now, while others are more than 20 years in the future.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

As  the  NNAP  report  notes,  the  states  are  playing  an  increasing  role  in
nanotechnology. In 2004, state funding for nanotechnology-related projects was $400
million,  or  approximately  40  percent  of  the  total  federal  investment.  To  date,  State
funding  for  nanotechnology  has  been  focused  on  infrastructure—particularly  the
construction  of  new  facilities—with  some  research  support  being  provided  in  the
form  of  matching  funds  to  public  universities  that  receive  federal  research  dollars.
In addition to receiving state support, universities and national laboratories also le-
verage federal investments through industry contributions of funds or in-kind dona-
tions  of  equipment  and  expertise.  The  report  on  a  2003  NNI  workshop  on  regional,
State,  and  local  nanotechnology  initiatives  lists  18  specific  examples  of  these  non-
federal  initiatives.3 (Witnesses  at  the  hearing  will  describe  the  specific  approaches
being taken in New York, South Carolina, and Oregon.)

In  recent  years,  the  focus  has  been  on  the  construction  of  nanotechnology  facili-
ties,  but  as  these  building  projects  financed  by  federal,  State,  and  private  funding
are  completed,  the  nanotechnology  community  must  consider  how  best  to  capitalize
on these new resources. Specifically, funding will have to be found for operating ex-
penses,  and  policies  that  will  attract  public  and  private  sector  users  to  these  facili-
ties  will  be  needed  on  topics  such  as  collaboration,  intellectual  property,  and  usage
fees.

The  diversity  of  industry  sectors  will  be  a  challenge  for  developing  appropriate
education  and  workforce  training  programs  in  nanotechnology.  The  predicted  scale
and  breadth  of  research  and  manufacturing  jobs  related  to  nanotechnology  will  re-
quire  not  only  specialized  programs  but  also  integration  of  nanotechnology-related
information  into  general  science,  technology,  engineering,  and  mathematics  edu-
cation.

Finally, successful integration of nanotechnology into products will require an un-
derstanding of the standards and regulations needed to govern responsible manufac-
turing  and  use  of  nanotechnology-enabled  products.  Currently,  $82  million  of  the
NNI  R&D  funding  is  spent  on  research  related  to  the  societal  implications  of
nanotechnology.  Of  this  amount,  $38.5  million  is  specifically  directed  at  environ-
mental,  health,  and  safety  research,  while  the  remainder  is  for  the  study  of  eco-
nomic,  workforce,  educational,  ethical,  and  legal  implications.  In  addition  to  this
funding,  relevant  work  is  also  ongoing  in  other  NNI  focus  areas.  One  example  is
the  development  of  measurement  techniques  at  the  nanoscale  which  are  necessary
to set standards that can be used for quality control of nanotechnology products and
to  manage  compliance  with  safety  regulations.  Another  example  is  the  study  of  the
basic  mechanisms  of  interaction  between  nanoscale  materials  and  biological  sys-

3 Regional,  State,  and  Local  Initiatives  in  Nanotechnology  is  the  report  on  a  workshop  con-
vened on September 30–October 1, 2003 by the Nanoscale Science, Engineering and Technology
(NSET)  Subcommittee,  the  interagency  group  that  coordinates  NNI  activities.  The  report  is
available online at http://www.nano.gov/041805Initiatives.pdf.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

tems,  which  can  provide  critical  information  for  health  care  applications  as  well  as
safe use practices.
6. Witness Questions

The  witnesses  were  asked  to  address  the  following  questions  in  their  testimony:

Questions for Mr. Scott Donnelly:

• What  fields  of  science  and  engineering  present  the  greatest  opportunities  for
breakthroughs  in  nanotechnology,  and  what  industries  are  most  likely  to  be
impacted by those breakthroughs in both the near-term and the longer-term?
• What  are  the  primary  barriers  to  commercialization  of  nanotechnology,  and

how can these barriers be overcome or removed?

• To  what  extent  has  GE  made  use  of  university  research  and  of  facilities  at
universities  and  national  laboratories?  How  important  are  these  resources  to
GE’s research program and how could they be more helpful?

Questions for Dr. John Kennedy:

• How  does  the  Clemson  Center  for  Advanced  Engineering  Fibers  and  Films
(CAEFF)  interact  with  the  private  sector?  What  are  the  greatest  barriers  to
increased academic/industrial cooperation in nanotechnology?

• How  does  the  State  of  South  Carolina  provide  support  to  CAEFF  for
nanotechnology  and  other  high-technology  activities?  How  does  this  com-
plement funding from the Federal Government and the private sector? What,
if any, gaps remain?

• What  is  the  workforce  outlook  for  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  Federal
Government  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with
the  relevant  skills  to  meet  the  Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research
and  development  and  for  the  manufacture  of  nanotechnology-enabled  prod-
ucts?

• How can Federal and State governments, industry, and academia best cooper-

ate to facilitate advances in nanotechnology?

Questions for Dr. John Cassady:

• How  do  Oregon  State  University  (OSU)  and  the  Oregon  Nanoscience  and
Microtechnologies  Institute  (ONAMI)  interface  with  the  private  sector?  What
are  the  greatest  barriers  to  increased  academic/industrial  cooperation  in
nanotechnology?

• How  does  the  State  of  Oregon  provide  support  to  OSU  and  ONAMI  for
nanotechnology  and  other  high-technology  activities?  How  does  this  com-
plement funding from the Federal Government and the private sector? What,
if any, gaps remain?

• What  is  the  workforce  outlook  for  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  Federal
Government  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with
the  relevant  skills  to  meet  the  Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research
and  development  and  for  the  manufacture  of  nanotechnology-enabled  prod-
ucts?

• How can Federal and State governments, industry, and academia best cooper-

ate to facilitate advances in nanotechnology?

Questions for Mr. Michael Fancher:

• How  does  Albany  NanoTech  interface  with  the  private  sector?  What  are  the
in

academic/industrial 

cooperation 

increased 

greatest 
nanotechnology?

barriers 

to 

• How  does  the  State  of  New  York  provide  support  to  Albany  NanoTech  and
the University of Albany College of Nanoscale Science and Engineering? How
does  this  complement  funding  from  the  Federal  Government  and  the  private
sector? What, if any, gaps remain?

• What  is  the  workforce  outlook  for  nanotechnology,  and  how  can  the  Federal
Government  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with
the  relevant  skills  to  meet  the  Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research
and  development  and  for  the  manufacture  of  nanotechnology-enabled  prod-
ucts?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

• How can Federal and State governments, industry, and academia best cooper-

ate to facilitate advances in nanotechnology?

9

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

Chairman INGLIS. Good morning, everyone.
Thank  you  for  joining  us  for  this  hearing  on  nanotechnology.  It
is good of you to come this morning to the Research Subcommittee
on  a  topic  of  such  small  significance.  I  say  that,  of  course,  because
what  we  are  talking  about  here,  science  at  the  nanometer  scale,
starts  at  1/75,000  of  the  width  of  a  human  hair.  We  are  here  to
learn about nanotechnology, and I am excited to hear what our wit-
nesses will have to say. So I will keep this opening statement small
as well.

I  also  want  to  welcome  Ranking  Member  Hooley.  I  was  encour-
aged by her insightful questions at the last Research Subcommittee
hearing, and I am looking forward to what she will contribute this
morning.  I  am  also  seeing  that  she  and  I  are  dressed  in  the  right
colors  for  Oregon,  is  that  right?  And  Clemson  University,  I  would
point out, Dr. Kennedy.

I  am  not  a  scientist  by  background,  and  I  have  got  to  confess
that  I  didn’t  know  enough  about  this  subject  until  I  had  prepared
for  this  hearing.  I  am  not  alone.  A  recent  survey  by  MIT’s  tech-
nology  review  showed  that  more  than  half  of  all  Americans  have
no familiarity with nanotechnology. That is a shame, because these
technologies are changing the products we use and have the poten-
tial  to  revitalize  our  manufacturing  base.  We  must  be  about  edu-
cating  our  children  in  math  and  science  if  they  will  need  to  do
these  jobs.  I  know  Ms.  Hooley,  being  a  former  teacher,  will  have
something to say about that as well.

This morning, the President’s Council of Advisors on Science and
Technology  released  a  report  on  the  state  of  and  outlook  for
nanotechnology  in  the  United  States.  On  the  whole,  the  report  is
very  encouraging,  noting  that  we  lead  the  world  by  most  metrics,
including  funding,  patents,  and  scientific  publications.  But  one  of
the things I found troubling is that other countries are catching up,
and  not  just  in  funding.  I  hope  we  can  talk  today  about  the  ways
the  United  States  can  maintain  its  status  as  a  world  leader  in
these emerging technologies.

For  those  of  us  who  are  technologically  challenged,  like  me,
nanotechnology  is  the  manipulation  of  matter  at  the  molecular
level  to  get  results  that  just  don’t  occur  in  larger  lumps  of  atoms.
It  promises  to  impact  virtually  every  field,  with  applications  in
fields  from  energy,  to  defense,  to  health  care,  to  transportation.
You  can  end  up  with  things  like  gold-covered  nanoshells  to  target
and  burn  cancer  away  or  light-weight,  super  strong  materials
structured  at  the  smallest  levels  that  could  increase  the  efficiency
of our airplanes and automobiles.

Our  experts  can  talk  more  about  nanotechnology’s  implications,
but what we really want to know is how to get it into products that
we  will  use  in  the  future.  Nanotechnology  is  one  of  the  few  tech-
nologies  where  basic  research  meets  the  marketplace  in  venture
capital startups and R&D at large firms. The witnesses here today
will  bring  the  process  to  life  and  let  us  in  government  know  how
we  are  helping  and  how  we  may  be  hurting  advances  in  this  very
promising area.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Inglis follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BOB INGLIS

Welcome.  It’s  good  of  you  to  come  to  this  hearing  at  the  Research  Subcommittee
on a topic of such small significance. I say that, of course, because what we’re talk-
ing  about  here—science  at  the  nanometer  scale—starts  at  a  size  1/75,000th  of  the
width  of  a  human  hair.  We’re  here  to  learn  about  nanotechnology,  and  I’m  excited
to  hear  what  our  witnesses  will  have  to  say,  so  I’ll  keep  this  opening  statement
small as well.

I  also  want  to  welcome  our  Ranking  Member,  Ms.  Hooley.  I  was  encouraged  by
her insightful questions in our last Research Subcommittee hearing, and I’m looking
forward to what she will contribute to this hearing.

I’m  not  a  scientist  by  background,  and  I’ve  got  to  confess  that  I  didn’t  know
enough  about  this  subject  until  I  had  to  prepare  for  this  hearing.  I’m  not  alone.  A
recent survey by MIT’s Technology review showed that more than half of all Ameri-
cans  have  no  familiarity  with  nanotechnology.  That’s  a  shame,  because  these  tech-
nologies  are  changing  the  products  we  use,  and  have  the  potential  to  revitalize  our
manufacturing  base.  We  must  be  about  educating  our  children  in  the  math  and
science  they  will  need  to  do  these  jobs.  I  know  Ms.  Hooley,  being  a  former  teacher,
has a lot to say about this.

This  morning,  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  re-
leased  a  report  on  the  state  of,  and  outlook  for,  nanotechnology  in  the  U.S.  On  the
whole,  the  report  is  very  encouraging,  noting  that  we  lead  the  world  by  most
metrics, including funding, patents, and scientific publications. But one of the things
I  find  troubling  is  that  other  countries  are  catching  up,  and  not  just  in  funding.  I
hope we can talk today about ways the U.S. can maintain its status as a world lead-
er in these emerging technologies.

For  those  of  us  who  are  technologically  challenged—like  me—nanotechnology  is
the manipulating of matter at the molecular level to get results that just don’t occur
in  larger  lumps  of  atoms.  It  promises  to  impact  virtually  every  field—with  applica-
tions in fields from energy to defense to health care to transportation. You can end
up with things like gold-covered nanoshells to target and burn cancer away, or light-
weight, super-strong materials structured at the smallest levels that could increase
the efficiency of our airplanes and automobiles.

Our experts can talk more about nanotechnology’s implications, but what we real-
ly  want  to  know  is  how  to  get  it  into  the  products  we  will  use  in  the  future.
Nanotechnology is one of the few technologies where basic research meets the mar-
ketplace  in  venture-capital  startups  and  R&D  at  large  firms.  The  witnesses  here
today will bring the process to life and let us in government know how we’re helping
and how we may be hurting advances in this very promising area.

Chairman INGLIS. With that, I would recognize Ms. Hooley for an

opening statement.

technology 

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you, Mr. Chair.
I am pleased to join you in welcoming our witnesses today to the
oversight hearing on the National Nanotechnology Initiative, or the
NNI.  One  of  the  signal  accomplishments  of  the  Science  Committee
in the last Congress was the development of the NNI authorization
legislation, which was signed into law in December of 2003. Calling
cliche´,  but
the 
nanotechnology  truly  is  revolutionary.  A  recent  National  Research
Council  report  explains  why  this  is  so:  ‘‘The  ability  to  control  and
manipulate  atoms  to  observe  and  stimulate  collective  phenomena
to  treat  complex  material  systems  and  to  span  length  scales  from
atoms to our everyday experience provides opportunities that were
not even imagined a decade ago.’’

revolutionary  has  become  a 

Nanotechnology will have an enormous consequence for the infor-
mation  industry,  for  manufacturing,  and  for  medicine  and  health.
Indeed, the scope of this technology is so broad as to leave virtually
no product untouched. The NNI is a coordinated federal R&D effort
that  seeks  to  ensure  the  United  States  is  at  the  forefront  of  re-
search  to  develop  nanotechnology  and  is  positioned  to  benefit  from
its many potential applications.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

The  focus  of  this  hearing  is  to  review  the  initial  assessment  of
the  NNI  by  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and
Technology.  This  assessment  is  mandated  by  statute  and  is  re-
quired to cover both the content and the management of NNI.

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  know,  the  Co-chair  of  PCAST  was  sched-
uled to appear today to present a report. However, the Administra-
tion  suddenly  and  inexplicably  found  a  constitutional  objection  to
this  appearance.  This  extraordinary  constitutional  interpretation
would  prevent  a  member  of  a  statutorily  mandated  Advisory  Com-
mittee  from  presenting  a  mandated  report  to  Congress.  I  would
hope  the  Science  Committee  will  formally  object  to  this  action  and
will  strenuously  assert  Congressional  prerogatives  for  access  to  in-
formation  about  the  implementation  of  this  federal  program,  and
we will talk about that when we get through.

One  aspect  of  the  NNI  that  the  Advisory  Committee  report
touches  on  and  is  of  great  interest  to  me  is  how  the  NNI  helps  fa-
cilitate  commercialization  of  the  technology.  I  believe  that  PCAST
will  have  some  recommendations  for  making  the  NNI  more  effec-
tive in this area. As the PCAST report points out, many states are
investing  in  nanotechnology.  And  of  course,  the  states  play  a  lead-
ing  role  in  economic  development.  Oregon  is  one  of  those  states
that  has  taken  steps  and  made  investments  to  help  create  new
commercial 
from
nanoscience research.

enterprises 

founded 

I am delighted that one of our witnesses this morning is Dr. John
Cassady,  who  is  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Oregon  State  Uni-
versity, and I did wear these colors in his honor today. Mr. Cassady
is  closely  involved  with  the  Oregon  Nanoscience  and  Microtech-
nologies Institute, of what we call ONAMI, a collaboration between
Oregon’s  three  major  research  universities,  federal  research  agen-
cies,  and  the  state’s  thriving  high-tech  sector.  Dr.  Cassady  will  be
able to describe how Oregon is supporting nanotechnology develop-
ment  and  how  ONAMI,  which  emphasizes  rapidly  commercializing
new technology, works in partnership with the private sector.

I hope to learn today how NNI could be more effective in helping
transfer  technology  to  the  private  sector  and  helping  support  the
commercialization process. I will be interested in the experiences of
our witnesses and in their recommendations.

Mr.  Chair,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing,  and  I
want  to  thank  our  witnesses  for  appearing  before  the  Sub-
committee today, and I look forward to our discussion.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Ms. Hooley follows:]

on 

results 

flowing 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE DARLENE HOOLEY

Mr. Chairman, I am pleased to join you in welcoming our witnesses today to this
oversight hearing on the National Nanotechnology Initiative, or the NNI. One of the
signal  accomplishments  of  the  Science  Committee  in  the  last  Congress  was  the  de-
velopment  of  the  NNI  authorization  legislation,  which  was  signed  into  law  in  De-
cember 2003.

Calling  a  technology  ‘‘revolutionary’’  has  become  a  cliche´.  But  nanotechnology
truly is revolutionary. A recent National Research Council report explains why this
is so:

‘‘The ability to control and manipulate atoms, to observe and simulate collective
phenomena,  to  treat  complex  materials  systems,  and  to  span  length  scales  from

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

atoms  to  our  everyday  experience,  provides  opportunities  that  were  not  even
imagined a decade ago.’’

Nanotechnology  will  have  enormous  consequences  for  the  information  industry,
for manufacturing, and for medicine and health. Indeed, the scope of this technology
is  so  broad  as  to  leave  virtually  no  product  untouched.  The  NNI  is  the  coordinated
federal  R&D  effort  that  seeks  to  ensure  the  U.S.  is  at  the  forefront  of  research  to
develop nanotechnology and is positioned to benefit from its many potential applica-
tions.

The  focus  of  this  hearing  is  to  review  the  initial  biennial  assessment  of  the  NNI
by  the  President’s  Council  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology.  This  assessment
is  mandated  by  statute  and  is  required  to  cover  both  the  content  and  the  manage-
ment of the NNI.

Mr.  Chairman,  as  you  know,  the  co-chair  of  PCAST  was  scheduled  to  appear
today to present this report. However, the Administration suddenly and inexplicably
found a constitutional objection to his appearance. This extraordinary constitutional
interpretation  would  prevent  a  member  of  a  statutorily  mandated  advisory  com-
mittee  from  presenting  a  statutorily  mandated  report  to  Congress.  I  trust  the
Science  Committee  will  formally  object  to  this  action  and  will  strenuously  assert
congressional  prerogatives  for  access  to  information  about  the  implementation  of
federal programs.

One  aspect  of  the  NNI  that  the  advisory  committee  report  touches  on  and  that
is  of  great  interest  to  me  is  how  the  NNI  helps  facilitate  commercialization  of  the
technology.  I  believe  PCAST  will  have  some  recommendations  for  making  the  NNI
more effective in this area. As the PCAST report points out, many States are invest-
ing in nanotechnology and, of course, the States play a leading role in economic de-
velopment.  Oregon  is  one  of  those  States  that  has  taken  steps  and  made  invest-
ments  to  help  create  new  commercial  enterprises  founded  on  results  flowing  from
nanoscience research.

I  am  delighted  that  one  of  our  witnesses  this  morning  is  Dr.  John  M.  Cassady,
who is Vice President for Research at Oregon State University. Dr. Cassady is close-
ly involved with the Oregon Nanoscience and Microtechnologies Institute (ONAMI),
a collaboration between Oregon’s three major research universities, federal research
agencies, and the state’s thriving high-tech sector.

Dr. Cassady will be able to describe how Oregon is supporting nanotechnology de-
velopments  and  how  ONAMI,  which  emphasizes  rapidly  commercializing  new  tech-
nology, works in partnership with the private sector.

I  hope  to  learn  today  how  the  NNI  could  be  more  effective  in  helping  transfer
technology  to  the  private  sector  and  in  helping  support  the  commercialization  proc-
ess.  I  will  be  interested  in  the  experiences  of  our  witnesses  and  in  their  rec-
ommendations.

Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  calling  this  hearing  and  thank  our  wit-
nesses  for  appearing  before  the  Subcommittee  today.  I  look  forward  to  our  discus-
sion.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Ms. Hooley.
I might take the prerogative of the Chair just to mention that we
do agree with you that it is disappointing that we are not going to
be able to hear from the President’s advisor on this. We had hoped
that  he  would  be  here  to  testify.  The  good  news,  however,  is  that
the  report  is  available  at  the  back  of  the  room  and  on  the  web.  It
would have been nice to have had the opportunity to ask questions
and  to  see  the  full  presentation  of  that,  and  yes,  Ms.  Hooley,  the
Science  Committee  is  expressing  our  desires  in  that  area  and  ex-
pressing the prerogatives of the House to have access to that proc-
ess.

It  was,  however,  a  public  process  that  developed  the  report  and
the report itself is public, so no secret deals here. It is just a matter
that  it  would  be  better  if  he  were  here  to  make  the  presentation.
So other Members are invited to make opening statements avail-

able for publication in the record this morning.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Johnson follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE EDDIE BERNICE JOHNSON

15

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  calling  this  very  important  hearing  today.  I  wel-

come our distinguished witnesses.

The  purpose  of  this  hearing  is  to  examine  federal  nanotechnology  research  and

development and to explore the outlook for the future.

Nanotechnology is the act of manipulating matter at the atomic scale. Regardless
of  the  diverse  opinions  on  the  rate  at  which  nanotechnology  will  be  implemented,
people  who  make  it  a  habit  to  keep  up  with  technology  agree  on  this:  it  is  a  tech-
nology in its infancy, and it holds the potential to change everything.

Research in nanoscience is literally exploding, both because of the intellectual al-
lure of constructing matter and molecules one atom at a time, and because the new
technical  capabilities  permit  creation  of  materials  and  devices  with  significant  soci-
etal  impact.  The  rapid  evolution  of  this  new  science  and  the  opportunities  for  its
application  promise  that  nanotechnology  will  become  one  of  the  dominant  tech-
nologies  of  the  21st  century.  Nanotechnology  represents  a  central  direction  for  the
future of chemistry that is increasingly interdisciplinary and ecumenical in applica-
tion.

Currently,  manufacturing  methods  at  the  molecular  level  are  very  unsophisti-
cated. Methods such as casting, grinding, milling and even lithography move atoms
in  cumbersome  and  unyielding  manners.  It  has  been  compared  to  trying  to  make
things  out  of  LEGO  blocks  with  boxing  gloves  on  your  hands.  Yes,  you  can  push
the LEGO blocks into great heaps and pile them up, but you can’t really snap them
together the way they should be attached.

In  the  future,  nanotechnology  will  let  us  take  off  the  boxing  gloves.  We’ll  be  able
to snap together the fundamental building blocks of nature easily, inexpensively and
in  most  of  the  ways  permitted  by  the  laws  of  physics.  This  will  be  essential  if  we
are to continue the revolution in computer hardware beyond about the next decade,
and will also let us fabricate an entire new generation of products that are cleaner,
stronger, lighter, and more precise.

I agree with the assessment that nanotechnology is one of the most promising and
exciting  fields  of  science  today.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  this  committee  on
its advancement.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Honda follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE MICHAEL M. HONDA

it 

transcends 

Chairman  Inglis  and  Ranking  Member  Hooley,  thank  you  for  holding  this  impor-
tant  hearing  today.  As  we  all  have  heard  at  prior  hearings,  the  emerging  field  of
nanotechnology  may  lead  to  unprecedented  scientific  and  technological  advances
that  will  benefit  society  by  fundamentally  changing  the  way  many  items  are  de-
signed  and  manufactured.  It  will  take  many  years  of  sustained  investment  for  this
field  to  achieve  maturity.  There  is  an  important  role  for  the  federal  government  to
play  in  the  development  of  nanotechnology,  since  this  science  is  still  in  its  infancy.
This committee, the Congress, and the President all acknowledged that when we en-
acted the 21st Century Nanotechnology Research and Development Act in 2003.

traditional  areas  of  expertise. 

The  interdisciplinary  nature  of  nanotechnology  presents  a  challenge  for  the  sci-
entific community and the research and development bodies of governments and in-
dustry,  since 
In  addition,
nanotechnology  will  likely  give  rise  to  a  host  of  novel  social,  ethical,  philosophical,
and  legal  issues.  For  these  and  other  reasons,  in  the  legislation  this  committee  re-
quired  the  National  Nanotechnology  Advisory  Panel  to  report  back  to  the  Congress
on  trends  and  developments  in  nanotechnology  science  and  engineering;  progress
made  in  implementing  the  Program;  the  need  to  revise  the  Program;  the  balance
among  the  components  of  the  Program,  including  funding  levels  for  the  program
component  areas;  whether  the  program  component  areas,  priorities,  and  technical
goals developed by the Council are helping to maintain United States leadership in
nanotechnology;  the  management,  coordination,  implementation,  and  activities  of
the Program; and whether societal, ethical, legal, environmental, and workforce con-
cerns  are  adequately  addressed  by  the  Program.  I  am  pleased  that  this  report  is
being  released  today  and  that  it  has  found  the  program  is  working  successfully,  al-
though  I  am  troubled  by  the  fact  that  we  are  not  able  to  have  Floyd  Kvamme,  Co-
chair  of  PCAST,  which  is  serving  as  the  NNAP,  here  with  us  today  and  urge  the
Administration to revisit its position on this policy.

It is critical that the United States invests in nanotechnology and does so wisely.
Other 
industrialized  countries  are  already  spending  more  per  capita  on
nanotechnology  than  the  US.  Leading  nanotechnology  researcher  Dr.  R.  Stanley
Williams of Hewlett-Packard Laboratories believes that ‘‘we are in a global struggle

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

to dominate the technological high ground, and thus a large portion of the economy,
of  the  21st  Century.  The  U.S.  cannot  outspend  the  rest  of  the  world  this  time,  so
we  must  be  by  far  the  most  productive  at  creating  new  technologies  and  the  most
efficient at bringing them to the marketplace. This will require coordination and co-
operation across a wide variety of institutions and disciplines such as we have never
seen before in the U.S. To fail places the wealth and security of this nation at seri-
ous  risk.’’  I  look  forward  to  hearing  the  thoughts  of  these  distinguished  witnesses
about the role the Federal Government should play in helping to commercialize the
fruits  of  its  research  investments,  and  the  impact  this  will  have  on  the  future  of
nanotechnology.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Carnahan follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RUSS CARNAHAN

Mr.  Chairman  and  Ms.  Ranking  Member,  thank  you  for  holding  this  important

and very interesting hearing.

The creation of the National Nanotechnology Initiative is a program with tremen-

dous vision and I am thrilled to be supportive of the effort.

Nanotechnology  has  the  promise  of  allowing  scientists  to  control  matter  on  every
length  scale,  including  materials  in  the  range  of  one  to  100  nanometers.  Science  is
allowing  us  to  control  material  behavior  by  altering  structures  at  the  level  of  one
billionth of a meter.

The field includes three main categories of promise, materials and manufacturing,
information  technology  and  medicine.  I  am  most  eager  to  see  what  this  technology
can do for our nation’s health and am hopeful that the utilization of nanotechnology
will someday positively affect our economy and job market.

I  welcome  the  witnesses  to  our  subcommittee  today  and  look  forward  to  hearing

their testimony. Thank you.

Chairman  INGLIS.  It  is  now  my  pleasure  to  introduce  to  you  our
panel.  Mr.  Scott  Donnelly  is  the  Senior  Vice  President  from  Gen-
eral  Electric  Corporation,  we  are  very  pleased  to  have  you,  Mr.
Donnelly.  Dr.  John  Kennedy  is  the  Director  of  the  Center  for  Ad-
vanced  Engineering  Fibers  and  Films  at  Clemson  University  in
South  Carolina.  And  Ms.  Hooley,  we  are  in  the  right  orange  cat-
egory here. I have got on Clemson orange here. Dr. John Cassady,
who  Ms.  Hooley  introduced  earlier,  is  the  Vice  President  for  Re-
search  for  Oregon  State  University.  And  Mr.  Michael  Fancher  is
Director  of  Economic  Outreach  at  Albany  NanoTech.  He  was  very
nice to invite me to come see what they are doing, and I suggested
that  August  would  be  a  good  time  to  come  to  Albany,  especially  if
you  are  coming  from  South  Carolina  in  August.  Dr.  Kennedy  will
understand that.

So  we  would  be  happy  to  start  with  your  testimony,  Mr.  Don-

nelly.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  SCOTT  C.  DONNELLY,  SENIOR  VICE
PRESIDENT  FOR  GLOBAL  RESEARCH,  CHIEF  TECHNOLOGY
OFFICER, GENERAL ELECTRIC COMPANY
Mr.  DONNELLY.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  It  is  a
pleasure  to  be  here  to  testify  with  respect  to  this  important  tech-
nology.

GE’s  research  laboratories  have  been  conducting  basic  and  ap-
plied  research  for  over  100  years.  It  is  the  primary  mission  of  our
research  laboratories  to  investigate,  develop  new  technologies,  and
most  importantly  transition  those  technologies  in  a  consequential
way into our General Electric businesses. As a result of the family
of  product  lines  in  GE,  data  encompasses  a  very  broad  range  of
technologies  in  support  of  energy,  aircraft  engines,  health  care,  se-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

curity,  water,  and  a  number  of  other  important  commercial  fields
of interest.

The  cornerstone,  frankly,  of  our  research  laboratories  for  over
100 years has been materials research. Our materials systems end
up impacting in a significant way various different products in GE.
As  a  result,  nanotechnology  is  a  very  important  area  of  focus  for
research for us and has been for a number of years.

I  think  it  is  very  important,  the  way  we  look  at  nanotechnology
is not so much in the heart that sometimes is heard or some of the
wonderful  non-fiction  work  that  has  been  published,  but  to  recog-
nize the incredible importance of this technology, it truly is a revo-
lutionary way to look at material science and has an amazing num-
ber of properties that we think have revolutionized a lot of our GE
products.

So  when  we  look  at  nanotechnology  and  the  importance  of  this
area  of  research,  we  really  think  about  how  that  translates  ulti-
mately into our product lines. When we look at businesses like our
aircraft  engine  business  of  today,  for  our  customers  it  is  very  im-
portant to drive increasing fuel efficiency and lower emissions, and
extending  the  time  between  maintenance  intervals  for  our  cus-
tomers  is  incredibly  important,  and  we  look  at  nanotechnology  as
a  very  important  way  in  developing  new  material  systems  that
have  the  robust  performance  features  to  allow  higher  firing  tem-
peratures,  more  robust  in  terms  of  that  their  time  on  wing  is  very
important  to  the  economic  model  of  that  whole  industry,  frankly,
and as a result is an important area for us to focus on.

Our energy business is likewise and our conventional gas turbine
technologies  is  very  much  like  aircraft  engines.  There  is  a  never-
ending  push  for  higher  efficiencies  and  lower  emissions,  lower
maintenance  cycles,  and  this  technology  is  very  promising  in  a
number of areas.

It  is  also,  we  think,  a  very  important  technology  as  we  think
about  renewable  energies,  things  like  solar  cells  and  photovoltaics,
as  a  new  technology  that  gives  us  an  additional  number  of  mate-
rials  to  take  a  lot  of  very  promising  new  technologies  and  actually
make  those  technologies  economically  affordable  and  therefore  in-
crease  the  penetration  of  the  amount  of  renewable  technology  that
we deploy across the world.

In  addition  to  energy  generation,  we  look  very  much  at  our  con-
sumer  product  lines  and  how  we  consume  electricity,  lighting,  and
appliances and technologies like that, in which we invest consider-
ably, in our look at how you make those more efficient, how do you
introduce  new  technologies  that  would  replace  conventional  com-
pression  technology,  let  us  say,  with  thermoelectrics,  replace  light-
ing with more highly efficient lighting, reduce things like mercury.
All of these kinds of material systems, which for many years, have
been dominant in this industry, we actually believe now can be re-
placed  or 
the  suite  of
nanotechnology-based materials.

looked  at  very  differently  with 

Other  increasingly—when  we  look  at  our  security  business,  the
ability  to  do  things  that  are  very  challenging  in  the  security  envi-
ronment,  like  doing  bio-detection  of  bio-agents  in  either  the  air  or
the water are enabled by a number of new technologies that we are
looking  at  using  nano-based  labels  for  these  product  lines.  And  we

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

also  think  it  will  have  a  pervasive  impact  in  our  health  care  busi-
ness where we looked at both increasing a higher spatial and tem-
poral  resolution  of  our  medical  scanners,  and  frankly,  introducing
a  whole  new  line  of  product  lines  and  diagnostic  pharmaceuticals
that  allow  the  targeting  of  specific  biological  activities  in  the  body
so  that  we  can  actually  diagnose  patients  with  specific  diseases
long  before  they  would  see  symptoms  of  the  disease  in  total.  And
a  lot  of  that  can  be  enabled  by  the  use  of  these  nanomaterials  to
give  us  the  kind  of  signal  that  a  doctor  would  look  for  to  make  a
clinical determination very early on in a disease onset.

So these are all very, very important technologies for us. The re-
search  in  this  area  is  very,  very  difficult:  identifying  new  composi-
tions, exploiting those new material systems that give you very ro-
bust characteristics that we haven’t seen before, and just as impor-
tantly, learning how to process those materials. I always like to tell
people  we  don’t  make  nano-sized  high  pressure  turbine  blades  or
nano-sized  aircraft  engines,  and  so  the  ability  not  just  to  identify
these  material  properties  but  to  learn  the  manufacturing  process
development  by  which  you  can  make  real  products  and  real  sizes
and maintain the material characteristics that we saw at that nano
scale is a very, very challenging task and one that requires a great
deal of research, and frankly, time to occur.

The federal role, when we look at what is going on through NNI,
the  funding  for  research  and  development  activity  and  deployment
that we see in agencies like the Department of Energy, the Depart-
ment of Defense, National Institutes of Health, is very encouraging.
These  are  relatively  long-time  constant  technologies,  as  any  mate-
rial  system  has  historically  been,  to  develop  and  deploy  these.  So
the  Federal  Government  funding  and  support  of  those  programs  is
very  important.  Frankly,  the  early  adoption  is  very  important  to
have  an  opportunity  to  deploy  some  of  these  technologies  and  get
them  into  the  field  and  learn  how  to  control  and  manipulate  them
is  very  important.  The  funding  that  we  see  that  goes  through  the
National  Science  Foundation  to  universities  is  extremely  impor-
tant.  In  our  research  laboratories  every  year,  we  hire  approxi-
mately  about  100  new  Ph.D.  students,  most  of  which  are  con-
ducting  research  for  us  in  material  sciences,  and  many  of  them  in
the  field  of  nanotechnology.  The  hundreds  of  graduates  at  the  BS
and  MS  levels  that  are  hired  into  our  GE  businesses  every  year
that  have  to  understand  and  have  an  appreciation  for  what  these
material systems can mean in terms of the design of the next gen-
eration of aircraft engine or health care scanner is very important.
And  so  the  NSF  funding  that  supports  the  nanocenters  and  im-
provement in those areas is very, very important.

So  in  summary,  nanotechnology  is  an  extremely  important  tech-
nical  field  to  us.  It  is  one  in  which  we  are  investing  a  great  deal
of funding. We are very supportive and appreciate the federal fund-
ing  that  is  going  into  this;  both  the  education  as  well  as  deploy-
ment  through  various  agencies  is  very  important,  and  we  look  for-
ward to continuing to support that activity in the future.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Donnelly follows:]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SCOTT DONNELLY

Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Hooley  and  Members  of  the  House

Research Subcommittee of the Committee on Science.

My  name  is  Scott  Donnelly,  and  I  am  the  Senior  Vice  President  for  Global  Re-
search for the General Electric Company. I am appearing here today to give you our
perspective  on  the  challenges  and  opportunities 
field  of
nanotechnology.

in  the  emerging 

The  term  ‘‘nanotechnology’’  has  quickly  become  one  of  the  latest  and  greatest
buzzwords  and  can  mean  different  things  to  different  people.  At  GE,  we  define
nanotechnology  as  the  ‘‘ultimate  material  science,’’  and  we  believe  that  the  novel
material  properties  found  at  the  nanoscale  can  be  leveraged  to  create  completely
new  material  performance  levels  for  a  wide  spectrum  of  products  and  applications.
The focus of our program at GE Research is to leverage these novel properties that
are  found  at  the  nanoscale  and  develop  methods  to  build  materials  from  the
nanoscale up to the macro world to capitalize on the enhanced performance charac-
teristics demonstrated by these materials.

We believe that nanotechnology has the potential to impact numerous industries.

Some examples include:

could increase jet engine efficiency

decreased emissions or enable alternative energy technologies

• Energy,  where  new  materials  may  enable  improved  machine  efficiency  and
• Transportation,  where  the  development  of  new,  lighter,  stronger  materials
• Homeland  Security,  where  nanomaterials  may  lead  to  improved  and  faster
• Health care, where the development of improved diagnostic agents and equip-
• Defense  applications,  where  the  development  of  new  materials  may  better

ment may lead to the diagnosis of diseases before symptoms even appear

detection of chemical and biological threats

protect our soldiers or their vehicles or enable more electric ships.

It  is  difficult  to  predict  which  industries  are  most  likely  to  be  impacted  in  the
near-term  and  which  will  be  impacted  in  the  longer-term.  What  is  more  likely  is
that  in  the  nearer-term  we  will  see  nanotechnology  making  relatively  incremental
improvements  to  currently  existing  products;  such  as  coatings  for  plastic  and  met-
als,  or  as  additives  to  existing  products.  As  with  all  new  technologies,  it  will  take
longer  to  realize  the  truly  revolutionary,  game-changing  technologies  that  will  cer-
tainly come from nanotechnology.

What  is  important  to  realize,  is  that  this  adoption  and  development  route  is  not

unique to ‘‘nanomaterials,’’ but is typical for all new material development.

The primary barriers to commercialization of nanotechnology lie in the translation
of  a  scientific  innovation  to  a  productive  and  cost-effective  technology.  The  process
of transitioning a successful experiment or even a prototype in a laboratory to a re-
producible,  high  quality,  cost  effective  manufacturing  process  is  a  time  consuming
and expensive hurdle for any invention. And even more challenging with high risk,
emerging  technologies  And  in  this  context  it  is  important  to  understand  that
nanotechnology  is  not  an  industry,  but  that  it  is  an  enabling  technology  that  will
likely  impact  many  industries,  but  that  the  challenges  and  solutions  for  one  area
do not necessarily (and probably will not) translate to other sectors.

The barriers to commercializing nanotechnology are not unique and are in fact the
same  for  any  new  product  or  application  and  will  require  significant  time  and
money—both  from  private  industry  and  the  government—to  overcome.  In  addition,
another  hurdle  nanotechnology  will  need  to  overcome  as  it  is  commercialized  is  the
need to develop unique manufacturing processes to preserve the novel properties of
the  nanomaterials.  To  date  there  has  been  a 
in
nanotechnology that has been done at Universities and there has been a significant
effort to establish nano-based centers and user facilities at universities and national
laboratories.  Much  of  this  has  been  done  as  part  of  the  National  Nanotechnology
Initiative and has provided solid scientific innovation in the field of nanotechnology.
In addition, this investment has started to lay the foundation for the nano-workforce
that  will  be  required  in  the  future.  Scientists  and  engineers  across  multiple  dis-
ciplines,  including  chemistry,  biology,  physics,  medicine,  electronics,  and  engineer-
ing,  will  need  not  only  to  be  able  to  work  at  the  nanoscale  but  they  will  also  need
to  have  the  ability  to  understand  and  develop  new  materials,  devices,  and  systems
that  have 
functions  because  of  their
nanostructure  and  because  of  the  convergence  of  these  multiple  disciplines.  Since
GE has it’s own corporate research center, we don’t typically need the infrastructure
provided  by  the  user  centers  and  facilities,  and  so  we  have  had  limited  interaction

fundamentally  new  properties  and 

large  body  of  research 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

with  these  sites.  We  do  collaborate  with  Universities  as  part  of  our  nanotechnology
program, as well as other research programs, and we have found the NSF Goali pro-
gram to be a good mechanism for collaborating with Universities.

In closing, the Nation’s nanotechnology program is poised to transition to the next
phase  of  it’s  development.  The  effort  to  date  has  resulted  in  well-done  science,  and
should  continue,  but  the  next  phase  must  also  address  nanotechnology  develop-
ment—that  is  making  nanotechnology  a  reality,  so  that  the  full  economic  potential
of nanotechnology and the benefit to the Nation can be realized.

Thank you Mr. Chairman for the opportunity to testify today, and I welcome any

questions.

BIOGRAPHY FOR SCOTT C. DONNELLY

Scott  C.  Donnelly  is  Senior  Vice  President  and  Director  of  GE  Global  Research,
one of the world’s largest and most diversified industrial research organizations, and
a member of the company’s Corporate Executive Council. At Global Research, some
2,200  people—including  approximately  1,700  scientists,  engineers  and  technicians
from  virtually  every  major  scientific  and  engineering  discipline—concentrate  their
efforts on the company’s long-range technology needs. The organization has research
facilities in the United States, India, China and Germany, working in collaboration
with GE businesses around the world.

Prior to assuming his current position, Donnelly served as Vice President, Global
Technology  Operations  for  GE  Medical  Systems.  In  that  role,  he  drove  Six  Sigma
product  development  throughout  the  organization,  enabled  GE  Medical  Systems  to
introduce  more  reliable  technology  faster  than  ever  before,  including:  the  world’s
first  multi-slice  CT  scanner 
full-field  digital  mammography
(Senographe  2000D),  high-field  open  MRI  (Signa  OpenSpeed)  and  digital  X–Ray
(Innova 2000).

(LightSpeed), 

Donnelly  joined  GE  in  1989  as  Manager  of  Electronics  Design  Engineering  for
GE’s  Ocean  Systems  Division  in  Syracuse,  NY.  He  went  on  to  serve  in  a  variety  of
leadership roles for the Company, including engineering management positions with
then-GE division of Martin Marietta in both Australia and the U.S.

In  1995,  he  moved  to  GE’s  Industrial  Control  Systems  business,  where  he  held
leadership  positions  as  Manager  of  Technology  and  System  Development,  and  later
General  Manager  of  Industrial  Systems  Technology.  Donnelly  was  named  a  Vice
President  of  General  Electric  in  1997,  when  he  assumed  his  previous  role  at  GE
Medical Systems.

Donnelly  is  a  1984  graduate  of  the  University  of  Colorado  at  Boulder,  where  he

earned a Bachelor’s degree in Electrical and Computer Engineering.

Donnelly serves on the Industrial Advisory Committee of several engineering col-
leges, the Research Foundation of the Medical College of Wisconsin and the Center
for  Innovation  in  Minimally  Invasive  Therapy  at  Massachusetts  General  Hospital.
He also serves as a Director of GE Capital Corporation and GE Capital Services Inc.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Mr. Donnelly.
Dr. Kennedy.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JOHN  M.  KENNEDY,  DIRECTOR,  CENTER
FOR  ADVANCED  ENGINEERING  FIBERS  AND  FILMS,
CLEMSON UNIVERSITY
Dr.  KENNEDY.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Inglis  and  Ranking
Member  Hooley.  Greetings  from  South  Carolina,  Clemson  Univer-
sity.

Clemson  University  continues  to  climb  in  the  national  rankings,
which  bodes  well  for  the  State  of  South  Carolina  and  its  drive  to-
ward a knowledge-based economy.

On  behalf  of  the  Center  for  Advanced  Engineering  Fibers  and
Films  representing  Clemson  University,  our  university  partners
MIT,  Clark  Atlanta  University,  and  supporting  industries,  I  would
like to thank the Committee for inviting me to testify.

The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  provides  a  systemic  pro-
gram for helping the United States maintain its research and tech-
nical leadership in an increasingly competitive global environment.
I  am  pleased  to  be  here  to  provide  CAEFF  support  for  the  initia-
tive.

CAEFF  is  one  of  22  engineering  research  centers  funded  by  the
National  Science  Foundation.  We  provide  an  integrated  research
and education environment for the systems-oriented study of fibers
and  films.  CAEFF  promotes  the  transformation  from  trial-and-
error development to computer-based design. The industry partners
provide  practical  perspective  on  our  research  program.  For  these
industries  to  leverage  advances  at  the  nano  level,  computer-mod-
eling  techniques  that  maximize  engineers’  understanding  of  and
control over structure are required.

The  CAEFF  team  is  very  active  in  nanotechnology  research.  We
are  studying  carbon  nanotubes  for  bio-sensors,  filtration,  bio-com-
patibility, coatings, and infection prevention. We are also exploring
nanotechnology  to  improve  wound  and  incision  healing  and  as  a
means  for  hydrogen  storage.  CAEFF  supports  a  critical  component
of the U.S. manufacturing base.

However,  globalization  is  changing  this  industry.  A  significant
portion of the commodity fiber industry has relocated outside of the
United  States.  The  polymer  industry  is  adjusting,  however,  to
globalization  by  focusing  on  value-added  products,  which  ties  well
to the push for an economy driven by innovation.

CAEFF  is  focusing  its  research  on  six  product  areas:  carbon
products  for  transportation,  bio-based  polymers,  bio-inspired  poly-
mers,  fibers  and  films  for  biotechnology,  photovoltaic  films,  and
sensing films. Each area supports specific commercial products that
could  help  reshape  the  polymer  industry.  CAEFF  derives  its  sup-
port  from  four  sources:  the  base  NSF-ERC  grant,  the  State  of
South  Carolina,  industry  membership  fees,  industry-supported  re-
search,  and  other  federal  support.  The  collective  support  for
CAEFF has been outstanding, enabling us to be positioned as a na-
tional leader in polymer research.

CAEFF is training a new workforce to develop nano-based appli-
cations.  A  team  of  universities  led  by  our  center  is  developing  an
undergraduate,  macro-molecular  engineering  curriculum  that  ad-
dresses  design  at  the  molecular  level.  This  exciting  concept  will
combine features of materials science and engineering so that grad-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

uates  can  consider  molecular  or  nano  issues  in  the  design  of  new
value-added products.

Another  workforce  issue  is  the  supply  of  American  citizens  in-
volved in nano research. One goal of CAEFF is to develop a diverse
community  of  scholars  trained  in  polymeric  materials  design.  We
are  making  great  progress.  The  center  has  formed  a  partnership
with Clark Atlanta University to increase the participation of Afri-
can  American  faculty  and  students.  Diversity  in  the  center  is  also
fostered  by  outreach  through  Women  in  Science  and  Engineering,
the Girl Scouts, summer research, graduate assistantships in areas
of national need, Hearst Fellowships, and the newly-funded South-
east Alliance for Graduate Education and the Professoriate.

Our  graduates  are  entering  the  workforce  as  engineers  and  sci-
entists in the polymer industry. Many of them have taken jobs with
our industry partners. Several have chosen to enter academe.

The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  provides  significant  sup-
port  for  infrastructure,  faculty,  and  students.  As  various  compo-
nents  of  the  research  mature,  the  challenge  will  be  to  transfer  the
technology into profitable business ventures. It is likely that an en-
tirely new industry will be spawned from nanotechnology. This new
industry  will  be  comprised  of  small  businesses  that  are  exploiting
research  advancements.  For  these  companies  to  survive,  they  may
well need bridge funding.

To  accelerate  the  application  of  nanotechnology,  agencies  that
have a major stake in applied research and development can bring
nanotechnology  into  practice  through  demonstration  programs.
This  paradigm  was  used  successfully  by  NASA  and  DOD  to  accel-
erate the application of advanced composite materials 25 years ago.
These programs were partnerships between government and indus-
try that drove industry to educate its personnel, develop infrastruc-
ture, and validated the advantages afforded by composites.

Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  before  your  Subcommittee
today. I am fully supportive of the National Nanotechnology Initia-
tive. It is a critical initiative with huge potential to impact the citi-
zens  of  the  United  States.  I  would  be  glad  to  answer  your  ques-
tions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Kennedy follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN M. KENNEDY

Introduction

Good  morning,  Chairman  Inglis  and  Ranking  Member  Hooley.  Greetings  from
South  Carolina  and  Clemson  University.  Clemson  University  continues  to  climb  in
the national rankings which bodes well for the State of South Carolina and its drive
toward a knowledge-based economy. On behalf of the Center for Advanced Engineer-
ing Fibers and Films (CAEFF), our university partners (the Massachusetts Institute
of Technology and Clark Atlanta University), our 20 industry partners, and Clemson
University, I would like to thank the committee for inviting me to represent CAEFF
at  this  hearing.  The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  provides  a  systemic  pro-
gram for helping the U.S. maintain is research and technology leadership in the in-
creasingly  competitive  global  environment.  I  am  please  to  be  here  to  provide
CAEFF’s support of the Initiative.

The  Center  for  Advanced  Engineering  Fibers  and  Films  (CAEFF)  is  one  of  only
22  Engineering  Research  Centers  funded  by  the  National  Science  Foundation.  The
CAEFF  research  team  consists  of  faculty  and  students  from  nine  academic  depart-
ments at Clemson University (the lead institution), MIT (a core partner), Clark At-
lanta University (a core partner), Lehigh University, McGill University, the Univer-
sity  of  Illinois,  and  20  industry  partners.  CAEFF  provides  an  integrated  research
and  education  environment  for  the  systems-oriented  study  of  fibers  and  films.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

CAEFF promotes the transformation from trial-and-error development to computer-
based  design  of  fibers  and  films.  This  new  paradigm  for  materials  design  is  revolu-
tionizing fiber and film development.

The NSF began funding CAEFF in 1998 and funding will continue through 2008,
with  research  expenditures  approaching  $10  million  annually.  About  150  graduate
students, 75 undergraduates, 15 high school students, and 50 faculty members sup-
port  CAEFF’s  research  program.  Coordinated  with  CAEFF’s  research  is  an  edu-
cation  program  that  is  offering  innovative  multi-disciplinary  courses,  seminars,
short  courses,  and  workshops.  The  education  experience  is  further  enhanced  by  ac-
tivities that emphasize teamwork and communication skills. CAEFF promotes diver-
sity  in  its  research  team  through  scholarships,  fellowships,  and  collaboration  with
universities that serve under-represented populations.

CAEFF  is  a  cornerstone  of  Clemson  University’s  research  program.  Several  re-
search  niches,  particularly  nanomaterials,  fall  under  CAEFF,  and  other  developing
research  programs  have  been  incubated  in  CAEFF.  After  2008,  CAEFF  will  be  a
self-sufficient  research  enterprise  through  additional  government  and  foundation
funding, industry sponsorship, and royalties from intellectual property.
Nanotechnology-Related Research

The  CAEFF  team  is  very  active  in  nanotechnology  research  that  can  potentially
advance technology and impact our citizens’ health and well being. Our researchers
are using carbon nanotubes (highly ordered carbon structures) for biosensors, filtra-
tion,  biocompatible  coatings,  and  infection  prevention.  We  are  also  exploring
nanotechnology  as  a  means  for  improving  healing  from  surgery  and  wounds.  Con-
trolling  cell  growth  through  optimally  changing  the  texture  at  the  nano-level  of  su-
tures  and  meshes  will  strongly  influence  healing  and  repair  of  living  tissue  as  in
a hernia repair.

We  have  also  discovered  that  activated  carbon  fibers  (carbon  fibers  with  nano-
sized  pores)  can  be  used  to  achieve  30  percent  of  the  Department  of  Energy  hydro-
gen storage target at room temperature and moderate pressure.

Adding  nanoparticles  to  fibers  dramatically  improves  the  cut  resistance  of  the  fi-
bers.  Consequently,  we  are  presently  working  with  a  company  to  exploit  this  tech-
nology  for  protective  clothing  that  would  improve  workers’  safety.  This  technology
could be useful for police officers, workers that process food or handling sharp mate-
rials such as glass or sheet metal, or our infantry.

These  areas  point  to  nanotechnology  that  is  being  or  is  close  to  being  applied  in
a  commercial  venture.  However,  CAEFF  is  also  conducting  fundamental  research
that provides results in new knowledge that may have impact on the way we make
fibers or assembly materials. One of our research groups is trying to mimic the way
spiders make fibers because spiders have optimized the fiber spinning process. They
make  a  fiber  with  excellent  properties  at  about  room  temperature  and  atmospheric
pressure. Also, spiders do not use oil as the feedstock which is used for over 99 per-
cent  of  all  man-made  fibers.  All  of  the  man-made  fibers  require  various  combina-
tions  of  high  temperature,  high  pressure,  and  toxic  solvents.  If  we  could  mimic  the
process that spiders use to make fibers, then we could potentially develop processes
that are less energy intensive and environmentally friendly.

We have also learning how to assemble molecules. Once we know how to do this,
we  will  be  able  to  sense,  capture,  and  destroy  toxins.  This  technology  could  be  ap-
plied to provide healthier hospitals and security against bio-terrorism.

Another  research  group  has  learned  how  to  blend  materials  to  produce
nanolayers.  This  technology  has  been  termed  smart  blending.  The  implications  of
this technology are tremendous, so much so, that patents have been issued, several
companies have licensed the technology and many more are interested. With smart
blending,  plastic  parts  have  improved  strength,  food  packaging  prevents  spoilage
better,  and  static  build  up  in  plastic  parts  is  minimized.  We  are  just  beginning  to
tap the potential of this exciting technology.
Interaction with Industry

NSF  Engineering  Research  Centers  (ERC),  like  CAEFF,  are  required  to  have  in-
dustrial partners on the research team. These partners help the ERC define the sys-
tems-level  research  program  which  is  the  key  characteristic  of  an  ERC.  Systems-
level research occurs on three planes—fundamental knowledge, enabling technology,
and engineered system. Clearly, the industry partners provide practical perspective
on  what  fundamental  knowledge  is  needed,  the  technology  that  must  be  developed
to make the research advancement a viable commercial product, and the experience
to package the technology into a system for commercialization.

By  focusing  on  fiber  and  film  technology,  CAEFF  supports  a  critical  component
of the U.S. manufacturing base. The fiber and film industries provide the consumer

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

with  synthetic  fibers,  nonwoven  fabrics,  multi-layer  films,  flexible  packaging,  and
state-of-the-art  electronic  components—just  to  name  a  few  of  its  products.  When
CAEFF  was  selected  as  an  NSF  Engineering  Research  Center  in  1998,  economic
projections  indicated  that  the  fiber  and  film  industries  could  grow  by  50  percent
over  the  next  ten  years—if  they  responded  to  the  needs  of  their  customers  by  im-
proving  existing  products,  developing  new  products  for  future  markets,  and  insti-
tuting  more  efficient,  environmentally  friendly  processes.  If  it  was  apparent  then
that  traditional  research  and  development  practices,  basically  a  trial  and  error  ap-
proach  to  product  and  process  development,  had  not  produced  the  breakthroughs
necessary  to  revitalize  these  industries  so  crucial  to  our  quality  of  life,  today  it  is
glaringly evident. A significant portion of the commodity fiber industry has relocated
outside of the U.S. to take advantage of lower labor costs and to be close to the tex-
tile  industry  that  they  supply.  Industry-wide  restructuring  has  changed  the  oper-
ating  philosophy  of  many  major  producers,  who  have  increased  profitability  by  re-
ducing research and technical support. This point is driven home by the shift of pol-
yester production from the U.S., Europe, and Japan to China, Japan and India and,
closer to home, the regular announcements of textile plant closings in the southeast.
However,  the  polymer  industry  is  adjusting  to  globalization  by  focusing  on  value-
added or ‘‘niche’’ products and on products that are not labor intensive such as car-
pet and consumables. Development of value-added products ties well to the push for
an economy driven by innovation.

Since  its  inception,  CAEFF’s  mission  has  been  to  arm  industry  with  a  unique
modeling  tool  to  design  fiber  and  film  processes  and  predict  final  properties  of  the
fiber  or  film  product.  This  modeling  capability  provides  industry  with  the  knowl-
edge, in a user-friendly software package, to develop innovative fiber and film prod-
ucts. Some of our industry partners are using this capability in designing processes
for  new  polymers.  It  is  our  belief  that  the  fiber  and  film  industries  need  to  develop
products  and  processes  in  advanced  engineering  environments  that  use  computer
modeling  techniques  and  visualization  to  minimize  experimentation,  allow  manipu-
lation  of  both  molecular  and  continuum  information,  and  maximize  engineers’  un-
derstanding  of  and  control  over  structure  formation  and  resultant  properties.  The
properties of films and fibers depend on their polymeric structure. In nearly all com-
mercial fiber and film processes, this structure is created by the production process.
In response to these industry and societal needs, the Center has developed a ma-
terials  design  environment,  featuring  an  integrated  model  that  allows  users  to  de-
sign  an  entire  fiber  or  film  system  by  inputting  precursor  specifications,  processing
parameters,  and  desired  properties.  This  virtual  testbed  will  bring  design  improve-
ments to current manufacturing systems, and also significantly reduces, if not alle-
viates trial-and-error experiments needed for the design of next-generation fiber and
film processes.

Given  the  evolution  of  our  research  and  the  emerging  needs  of  industry,  CAEFF
revised its strategic research plan in the last year. The primary change to the stra-
tegic  plan  was  to  establish  six  systems-level  product  areas  that  complement  the
multi-length scale modeling effort that is the cornerstone of the vision and strategic
plan  of  CAEFF.  Each  of  the  product  areas  supports  an  opportunity  for  the  polymer
industry to develop value-added products. CAEFF is uniquely position to conduct re-
search  in  these  product  areas  because  each  requires  cross-disciplinary  teams  to
make substantive systems-level research advancements. The six product areas were
selected  because  they  focus  the  modeling  efforts  on  specific  commercial  products
that  could  help  reshape  the  polymer  industry  as  globalization  drives  production  of
conventional fibers and films offshore. The research will enable industry to shorten
the cycle from concept to commercialization.

CAEFF  presently  has  20  industry  partners  that  support  our  research  with  di-
rected  and  undirected  financial  support  and  in-kind  support.  Our  members  rep-
resent a broad spectrum of companies from large to small and producer to user. The
logos  of  our  industry  partners  are  shown  on  the  chart  below.  Each  member  pays  a
membership  fee  that  CAEFF  management  strategically  directs  to  research,  equip-
ment and management. Some companies choose to provide additional funding for re-
search specific to their needs. In this case, the company defines the research project.
In  many  cases  a  confidentiality  agreement  is  executed  so  that  the  company  can  ex-
ploit the results of the research that they sponsored.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

Our  industrial  collaboration,  including  transfer  of  intellectual  property,  is  gov-
erned  by  a  common  CAEFF  Membership  Agreement  that  all  companies  must  exe-
cute.  The  Membership  Agreement  provides  each  industry  partner  a  seat  on  the  In-
dustrial Advisory Board (IAB). The IAB is the body that provides industry guidance
on research direction and policy as discussed above. A primary function of the Mem-
bership Agreement is the transfer of intellectual property. The intellectual property
policy  in  the  Agreement  is  structured  to  favor  licensing  by  industry  partners.  The
following flow chart shows the licensing process that is called out in the Agreement.
The key features of the intellectual policy are: an industry sponsoring research has
first  rights  to  a  license  resulting  from  their  project;  intellectual  property  resulting
from  research  funded  by  NSF,  the  State,  or  other  federal  agencies  will  be  offered
to  all  of  the  industry  partners;  and  CAEFF  will  place  industry-experienced  per-
sonnel  on  the  committee  that  determines  which  intellectual  property  will  be  pat-
ented by Clemson University.

The  two  greatest  barriers  to  academic/industrial  cooperation  are  the  elimination
or  drastic  reduction  of  central  research  and  development  staff  in  large  companies
and  the  existence  of  companies  that  have  the  vision  to  exploit  new  nanotechnology
developed by CAEFF.
Support for CAEFF and Self Sufficiency

CAEFF derives its support from four sources: the base NSF ERC grant (currently
about  $3.8  million  annually),  the  state  of  South  Carolina  ($1.0  million  annually  as
cost  share  for  the  NSF  ERC  grant),  industry  membership  fees  (approximately
$150,000 annually), industry supported research ($250,000 annually), and other fed-
eral  support  routed  through  CAEFF  ($3.6  million  annually).  When  CAEFF  was  in
the formative stages the state and Clemson University provided even more support
for renovation of space and salary support for CAEFF leadership to develop the re-
search  and  education  program.  Additionally,  the  state  has  provided  funding  for  the
design  and  development  of  a  new  academic  building  on  the  Clemson  campus  for
CAEFF  and  the  School  of  Materials  Science  and  Engineering.  Construction  of  the
building  will  commence  when  the  next  bond  bill  is  approved  by  the  South  Carolina
legislature.

These funds can be divided into five broad categories: research, education, indus-
try liaison, equipment, and management with the largest portion going to research,
followed  by  education  and  equipment.  Generally,  the  support  for  industry  directed
research  his  highly  compatible  with  the  research  supported  by  NSF.  We  have  used
our modeling capability and experimental testbeds, developed with NSF support, on
numerous industry sponsored projects.

The  support  for  CAEFF  from  NSF  and  the  state  has  been  outstanding,  enabling
us  to  be  positioned  as  a  national  leader  in  polymer  research.  Professor  Mike  Jaffe
(New Jersey Institute of Technology and former employee of Hoechst Celanese Cor-
poration,)  has  suggests  that  CAEFF  provides  ‘‘World  leadership  in  modeling  at

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Clemson  CAEFF  ERC.’’  Without  the  NSF  ERC  and  State  support,  the  claim  would
not  be  possible.  The  NSF  support  for  CAEFF  will  terminate  in  July  2008  as  per
ERC guidelines. CAEFF leadership is developing a strategic plan to assure that the
NSF support will be replaced with funding from other resources.
Workforce Development for Nanotechnology

For  the  most  part,  the  workforce  and  those  entering  the  workforce  in  the
nanotechnology  area  have  received  traditional  engineering  or  science  educations
which do not provide a systems perspective related to nanotechnology. This perspec-
tive is crucial for companies because virtually all nano-based applications are multi-
disciplinary,  requiring  the  talents  of  scientists  and  engineers  from  several  dis-
ciplines. Further, most engineering programs teach design at length scales that are
much greater than the nanoscale.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

The Center is graduating students with a broad, systems-oriented technical foun-
dation;  modeling,  simulation,  and  visualization  skills;  the  critical  thinking  skills
necessary to both analyze and integrate information; an appreciation of the industry
perspective; and the teamwork and communication skills necessary to function effec-
tively  in  collaborative  virtual  design  environments.  CAEFF’s  integrated  research
and  education  programs  have  developed  advanced  materials  design  techniques  that
are  communicated  through  courses,  workshops  and  conferences,  and  outreach  pro-
grams.

CAEFF  is  working  with  a  team  of  universities  to  develop  an  undergraduate
macromolecular  engineering  curriculum  that  addresses  design  at  the  molecular
level.  This  exciting  concept  will  essentially  bring  together  features  of  a  materials
science  curriculum  and  those  of  engineering  disciplines  such  as  chemical  and  me-
chanical  so  that  graduates  will  have  background  to  consider  molecular  or  nano
issues in the design of systems. Adding molecular level considerations to the design
process  will  expand  the  design  envelope,  leading  to  new  value-added  products  in
transportation, medicine, defense, and national security.

Thirty-three  percent  of  South  Carolina’s  population  is  minority,  principally  Afri-
can-American,  the  opportunity  exists  to  greatly  increase  the  diversity  in  both  the
student  body  and  the  faculty.  For  the  population  of  South  Carolina’s  Land  Grant
University  to  reflect  the  demographics  of  the  state,  a  long-term,  well  funded  edu-
cational  program  must  be  implemented  at  all  societal  and  educational  levels  in
South  Carolina  so  that  all  students  realize  the  importance  of  higher  education  and
have  prerequisite  academic  credentials  and/or  enter  into  bridge  programs  that  give
them the opportunity to succeed in the rigorous academic environment of engineer-
ing  and  science  disciplines.  Consequently,  the  goal  of  CAEFF  became  to  develop  a
diverse  community  of  scholars  trained  in  polymeric  materials  design.  The  various
populations (pre-college, undergraduate, graduate and faculty) of this community of
scholars  will  mirror  the  demographics  of  the  State  of  South  Carolina.  Meeting  this
overall  metric  was  very  aggressive  and  will  substantially  exceed  national  engineer-
ing-wide  averages  for  the  involvement  of  women,  under-represented  racial  minori-
ties,  and  Hispanic-Americans.  We  are  approaching  our  goals  for  under-represented
racial  minorities  in  our  undergraduate  and  masters  student  populations.  Outlined
below are the components of CAEFF’s diversity program.

The Center has formed a partnership with Clark Atlanta University (CAU) to in-
crease  the  participation  of  African-American  faculty  and  students  in  the  research
and  education  programs  of  CAEFF.  A  research  contract  was  awarded  to  CAU  for
the  remainder  of  CAEFF’s  NSF  lifetime.  Faculty  members  and  students  from  CAU
are  being  integrated  into  CAEFF’s  research  topics  as  core  members  of  the  research
teams.  CAU  is  being  targeted  to  provide  undergraduate  and  graduate  students  to
CAEFF’s  programs  at  Clemson  University.  Our  intent  is  to  develop  a  dual  degree
program with CAU.

Diversity in the Center has been fostered by outreach through Women in Science
and Engineering, the Girl Scouts of the USA, and the Research Experiences for Un-
dergraduates  program.  The  Center  has  also  secured  supplemental  funding  to  sup-
port  diversity  initiatives.  Department  of  Education-funded  Graduate  Assistantships
in  Areas  of  National  Need  provide  attractive  financial  incentive  packages  to  minor-
ity  and  female  students  of  superior  academic  ability  from  across  the  Nation.  The
Hearst  Scholarship  endowment  targets  a  diverse,  academically  qualified  and  eco-
nomically  disadvantaged  student  population.  The  newly-funded  Southeast  Alliance
for Graduate Education and the Professoriate will provide a mechanism for recruit-
ing  students  from  the  University  of  Florida,  the  University  of  South  Carolina,  and
the University of the U.S. Virgin Islands. This grant will also provide international
opportunities for students through collaboration with the Latin American and Carib-
bean Consortium of Engineering Institutions.

Our graduates are entering the workforce as engineers and scientists in the poly-
mer  industry.  Many  on  them  have  taken  jobs  with  our  industry  partners.  Several
have chosen to enter academe.
The Federal/State/Industry/Academe Nanotechnology Partnership

The  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  provides  significant  support  for  infra-
structure, faculty, and students. As various components of the research mature, the
challenge  will  be  to  transfer  the  technology  in  to  profitable  business  ventures.  It  is
likely that an entirely new industry will be spawned from the nanotechnology initia-
tive.  This  new  industry  will  probably  be  comprised  of  small  businesses  that  fit  a
niche  or  are  exploiting  research  advancements.  For  these  small  companies  to  sur-
vive,  they  may  well  need  bridge  funding  which  can  be  made  available  through  the
Small  Business  Innovative  Research  and  Small  Business  Technology  Transfer  Pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

grams,  available  from  all  federal  agencies,  and  also  the  Advanced  Technology  Pro-
gram which is run through the National Institute of Standards and Technology.

To  accelerate  the  application  of  nanotechnology  and  to  identify  unforeseen  issues
surrounding  nanotechnology  systems,  agencies  that  have  a  major  stake  in  applied
research  and  development  such  as  NASA,  the  Department  of  Defense,  and  the  De-
partment  of  Transportation  can  bring  nanotechnology  into  practice  through  dem-
onstration  programs.  This  paradigm  was  used  successfully  by  NASA  and  the  De-
partment  of  Defense  to  accelerate  the  application  of  advanced  composite  materials
in  the  1970’s  and  1980’s.  These  programs  were  partnerships  between  government
and  industry  that  drove  industry  to  educate  its  personnel  and  develop  infrastruc-
ture.  It  also  provided  validation  of  the  advantages  afforded  by  composites.  Finally,
after 20 to 25 years, advanced composites are being extensively used on commercial
aircraft  for  major  structural  components.  This  large  time  lag  was  predictable  be-
cause  industry  needed  time  to  train  a  workforce,  establish  design  methods,  and
build  a  database,  all  of  which  are  required  for  confident  application  of  composites
in complex systems and structures.
Closure

Thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  before  your  subcommittee  today.  I  am  fully
supportive  of  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative.  It  is  a  critical  initiative  with
huge potential to impact the citizens of the U.S. I would be pleased to answer your
questions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

Chairman  INGLIS.  Thank  you,  Dr.  Kennedy.  We  look  forward  to

those questions.
Dr. Cassady.

STATEMENT OF DR. JOHN M. CASSADY, VICE PRESIDENT FOR

RESEARCH, OREGON STATE UNIVERSITY

Dr.  CASSADY.  Chairman  Inglis,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hear-
ing  on  the  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative.  It  is  a  privilege  to
be  invited  to  testify  before  you  this  morning  not  only  as  a  rep-
resentative  of  Oregon  State  University  and 
the  Oregon
Nanoscience  and  Microtechnologies  Institute,  ONAMI,  but  also  as
a  scientist  interested  in  the  intersection  of  research  and  economic
development.

I  also  want  to  acknowledge  how  pleased  we  are  at  Oregon  State
that  our  representative,  Congresswoman  Darlene  Hooley,  is  now
serving  as  the  Ranking  Minority  Member  on  this  Research  Sub-
committee.

I  want  to  acknowledge  the  assistance  of  the  leaders  of  ONAMI
at Oregon State, the Dean of Engineering, Ron Adams, and the Di-
rector of ONAMI, Skip Rung, for input to this testimony.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

My perspective is not as an expert in the area of nanotechnology,
but  as  a  person  trained  in  organic  chemistry  who  moved  into  the
interdisciplinary area of medicinal chemistry and was involved dur-
ing  my  research  career  in  the  discovery  and  design  of  potential
anti-cancer  drugs.  Nanotechnology  touches  health  in  a  major  way,
and eventually will have a major impact in the area of diagnostics
as well as drug delivery.

As a faculty member, department chair, dean of a college of phar-
macy,  and  now  the  new  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Oregon
State,  I  have  promoted  programs  that  are  interdisciplinary  and
translational, so one of the things that attracted me to Oregon was
the Oregon experiment in innovation that led to ONAMI.

Oregon  is  a  small  state,  but  it  is  thinking  and  planning  in  a  big
way  as  it  moves  in  the  direction  of  a  commercialization  alliance  in
micro  and  nanotechnology.  All  of  the  components  were  there  in
2000,  but  they  weren’t  aligned.  There  were  institutional  resources,
our state’s public research universities, Oregon State, University of
Oregon,  and  Portland  State,  powerful  research  enterprises,  the  in-
dustrial  infrastructure,  companies  comprising  the  Oregon  ‘‘Silicon
Forest,’’  Intel,  HP,  FEI,  LSI  Logic,  Xerox,  Tektronix,  ESI,  InFocus
Systems, Pixelworks, Sharp, and many others.

Another  strength  was  our  regional  government  laboratory,  Pa-
cific Northwest National Laboratory, PNNL. Then in 2002, an eco-
nomic  development  report  was  commissioned  by  the  state,  which
recommended  the  development  of  signature  research  centers.  In
2003, the Oregon State legislature created the Oregon Nanoscience
and  Microtechnologies  Institute,  ONAMI,  with  an  initial  allocation
of $21 million for support of operating costs and infrastructure.

The  state  began  a  commitment  to  make  innovation  a  high  pri-
ority.  The  research  universities,  the  high-tech  industries,  and
PNNL  joined  together  in  aligned  missions  in  a  national  model  for
collaboration.

Let  me  describe  one  of  the  partnerships  developed  at  Oregon
State  to  create  the  Microproducts  Breakthrough  Institute,  MBI.
This  institute,  which  is  housed  in  a  building  on  HP’s  campus,  is  a
result  of  a  collaboration  between  OSU  and  HP,  which  has  donated
the  lab  space,  and  PNNL,  which  is  providing  support  through  re-
search  collaborations  and  scientific  personnel  that  are  assigned  to
the  project.  When  the  institutes’  laboratories  become  operational
this year, up to 10 PNNL research staff are projected to be located
at MBI in addition to faculty and students from OSU.

Additional support from the state is expected, and this initial in-
vestment has leveraged over $5 million in support from the univer-
sities,  $10  million  from  industry  and  private  funding,  and  more
than  $30  million  in  competitive  research  awards.  This  cooperative
venture  is  unprecedented  and  will  lead  to  talented  graduates,  new
technology, and corporate development.

There  are  some  barriers  to  collaboration.  Some  of  these  are  cul-
tural.  On  the  academic  side  of  the  house,  I  think  it  is  acceptance
of new metrics for academic excellence and our reward system. On
the  corporate  side  of  the  house,  control  of  intellectual  property
rights  and  confidentiality  limitations  are  what  lead  to  what  I  con-
sider  to  be  non-transparent  communications,  in  addition,  rapid

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

changes  in  funding  decisions,  personnel  changes,  and  corporate
structure.

Some  of  the  barriers  to  protection,  transfer  and  commercializa-
tion  are  lack  of  investment  funds  for  IP  protection,  lack  of  gap
funding for product development, and developing processes to make
it easier to start businesses in the university.

We also need to make it easier to do business with the university
and streamline our IP licensing. There are workforce issues. There
is  an  impact  on  graduate  programs  due  to  security  issues,  and  we
need to keep the funding for research and graduate programs a pri-
ority.

In  order  to  facilitate  advances  in  these  areas,  one  possible  solu-
tion is to establish federal funding sources that set clear objectives
related to translation of technology and economic development, put
in place metrics to measure progress against these goals, and hold
recipients accountable for funding for achieving these outcomes.

It  is  the  people  of  Oregon  and  the  Nation  that  will  benefit  from
programs  like  ONAMI.  From  individuals  who  can  take  advantage
of  such  devices  as  compact  portable  home  kidney  dialysis  devices
to  communities  which  experience  economic  prosperity  with  the  es-
tablishment of new nanotechnology businesses and industry.

In  conclusion,  I  wish  to  thank  you  for  this  opportunity.
Nanotechnology  is  an  exciting  new  area,  which  will  have  tremen-
dous  impact  across  multiple  fields  of  science.  We  are  excited  that
in  Oregon  we  have  been  able  to  develop  a  vision  for  significant
partnerships, such as ONAMI, and that private, state, federal, and
university investments have made the vision a reality.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Cassady follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN M. CASSADY

Chairman  Inglis,  thank  you 

for  holding  this  hearing  on  the  National
Nanotechnology  Initiative.  It  is  a  privilege  to  testify  before  you  this  morning,  not
only  as  a  representative  of  Oregon  State  University  (OSU)  and  the  Oregon
Nanoscience and Microtechnologies Institute (ONAMI), but also as a scientist inter-
ested in the intersection of research and economic development. I spent nearly forty
years an academic research scientist and only recently closed my laboratory at Ohio
State  University  to  take  the  post  of  Vice  President  for  Research  at  Oregon  State
University.  I  am  very  excited  about  the  opportunity  to  oversee  the  OSU  research
enterprise and to work toward ensuring that innovation at the lab bench contributes
to  public  life,  be  it  through  public  education,  outreach  and  engagement  or  business
and industry. I also want to acknowledge how pleased we are at Oregon State Uni-
versity that our Representative, Congresswoman Darlene Hooley, is now serving as
the Ranking Minority Member on this Research Subcommittee.

My  testimony  to  you  this  morning  comes  from  the  perspective  of  a  research  ad-
ministrator. I am an organic chemist and spent most of my research career focused
on  the  discovery  and  design  of  anticancer  drugs;  I  am  not  an  engineer  by  training
nor  am  I  an  expert  in  nanotechnology.  However,  what  I  can  speak  to  is  the  desire
of researchers to ask questions and solve problems and what I believe is my respon-
sibility  as  a  research  administrator  to  direct  these  questions  in  a  way  that  works
to  sustain  the  Nation’s  economic  development  and  global  technological  leadership,
builds an educated workforce, and contributes to public health and security.

I believe these were all goals in the development of the National Nanotechnology
Initiative, which was envisioned as a roadmap for the Federal Government’s invest-
ments  in  a  critical  area  of  science.  In  Oregon,  we,  too,  kept  these  goals  in  mind  as
we  mapped  out  our  plan  to  be  a  part  of  this  scientific  revolution  and  designed  a
research  institute  that  created  innovative  new  partnerships  that  cross  university,
government  and  industry  boundaries  that  have  not  previously  been  formally  con-
nected.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

Three  words  describe  ONAMI:  innovation,  collaboration,  and  commercialization.
The  Oregon  Nanoscience  and  Microtechnologies  Institute  is  the  first  ‘‘signature  re-
search  center’’  funded  by  the  State  of  Oregon  for  the  purpose  of  growing  research
and business development in order to accelerate innovation-based economic develop-
ment in Oregon and the Pacific Northwest. Oregon policy-makers have the goal and
desire  to  establish  additional  ‘‘signature  research  centers’’  that  will  lead  to  a  long-
term  economic  and  competitive  advantage  for  Oregon,  including  commercialization
of academic research and the formation of new businesses.

ONAMI  is  also  an  unprecedented  and  powerful  collaboration  involving  Oregon’s
three public research universities—Oregon State University, Portland State Univer-
sity, and the University of Oregon; the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (Rich-
land,  WA);  the  State  of  Oregon;  and  the  emerging  ‘‘Silicon  Forest’’  high  technology
industry cluster of Oregon and southwest Washington.

Many  factors  precipitated  this  focus  on  nanotechnology  in  Oregon.  Businesses  in
Oregon were already leaders in industrial research and development. Intel employs
15,450  employees  in  Oregon  and  is  the  home  of  the  headquarters  of  their  semicon-
ductor  technology  research  and  development  unit.  Hewlett  Packard’s  Ink  Jet  head-
quarters  are  in  Oregon  and  the  company’s  largest  and  most  advanced  technology
site  with  3,900  employees  is  also  located  in  the  state.  FEI  Company,  LSI  Logic,
Tektronix,  Xerox,  Invitrogen,  InFocus,  Pixelworks  and  Electro  Scientific  Industries
are just a few of the many other technology-based industries with a significant pres-
ence  in  the  state.  Our  proximity  to  the  Department  of  Energy’s  Pacific  Northwest
National Laboratory (PNNL) was also a factor. PNNL, a $650 million year research
operation is the largest R&D operation west of Chicago and north of San Francisco.
And,  last,  but  certainly  not  least,  Oregon’s  three  largest  research  universities  have
world-class  expertise  and  have  decided  to  collaborate  in  three  critical  areas:  Micro-
technology-Based  Energy,  Chemical  and  Biological  Systems;  Safer  Nanomaterials
and Nanomanufacturing and Nanoscale Metrology for Nanoelectronics and other ap-
plications.

Microtechnology-based  Energy,  Chemical  and  Biological  Systems,  led  by  Kevin
Drost of Oregon State University and Landis Kannberg of the Pacific Northwest Na-
tional Laboratory, integrate nanoscale materials science and mechanical microstruc-
tures  to  miniaturize  a  wide  range  of  important  devices  for  both  military  and  com-
mercial  use.  Translational  research  and  commercialization  efforts  related  to  this
work  will  be  carried  out  by  the  Microproducts  Breakthrough  Institute  (MBI),  an
ONAMI facility jointly staffed and operated by PNNL and Oregon State University.
These  technologies  will  have  widespread  commercial  application  and  may  well
lead to whole new industries. Examples include compact power supplies for portable
electronics;  vehicular  and  auxiliary  fuel  cell  systems;  distributed  biofuel,  hydrogen,
and  chemical  production  at  point-of-use;  automotive  cooling  systems  that  operate
using  exhaust  heat;  and  a  new  generation  of  distributed  heating  and  cooling  sys-
tems for residences with energy savings of approximately 50 percent. OSU research-
ers  in  this  area  are  also  working  with  an  Oregon  company,  Home  Dialysis  Plus
(HD+), to develop a compact kidney dialysis machine that will dramatically improve
quality  of  life  for  end-state  renal  disease  patients  while  also  reducing  treatment
cost.

The Safer Nanomaterials and Nanomanufacturing research, led by Jim Hutchison
of  the  University  of  Oregon,  is  focused  on  developing  functional  nanomaterials  and
nanomanufacturing  methods  that  simultaneously  meet  the  need  for  high  perform-
ance materials, protect human health and minimize harm to the environment. This
initiative  has  been  focused  on  the  applications  of  mixed  nanoscale  and  microscale
systems to research problems such as those involved in nanomanufacturing. The ini-
tiative  takes  advantage  of  the  world-class  expertise  within  ONAMI  in  green  chem-
istry,  nanoscale  materials  and  processes  and  the  design  and  fabrication  of
microscale systems (such as microchannel reactors).

Discoveries  in  nanoscience  are  providing  new,  powerful  tools  for  achieving  green
chemistry goals such as reducing the use of hazardous materials and improving the
efficiency  of  material  and  energy  consumption.  The  opportunity  exists  to  apply
nanotechnologies  to  the  invention  of  new  products  and  processes  that  will  produce
superior  products  for  less  money  and  simultaneously  enhance  public  security  and
protect our environment. Researchers within the ONAMI are at the forefront in de-
fining  this  emerging  field  with  their  research  programs  that  focus  on  safer/greener
products and manufacturing methods for making products.

The  Nanoscale  Metrology  Initiative,  critical  to  continued  progress  in  semiconduc-
tors and other forms of nanoscale manufacturing, is led by John Carruthers, former
Director of Components Research and Development for Intel, and Distinguished Pro-
fessor  of  Physics  at  Portland  State  University  (PSU).  The  team’s  efforts  are  sup-
ported by the PSU microscopy facility, which features one of the Pacific Northwest’s

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

most powerful transmission electron microscopes and other instruments that enable
the  characterization  of  nanostructures.  The  ability  to  design,  fabricate  and  test
nanoscale materials and devices depends entirely on the ability to image and meas-
ure them, which the network of ONAMI-affiliated user facilities can provide.

The  purpose  is  to  initiate  additional  research  in  nanometrology  and  testing  of
nanodevices  and  circuits  that  enables  the  implementation  of  nanoscale  materials
into  useful  electronic  applications  such  as  high  density  memories  on  silicon  inte-
grated circuits.

This  will  leverage  the  large  nanotechnology-related  investments  of  LSI  Logic,
Nantero, Intel, Hewlett-Packard, ESI, FEI Company, and Invitrogen in Oregon’s ‘‘I–
5  Technology  Corridor’’  between  Portland  and  Eugene  and  ensure  that  a  leading
edge research and education capability will be established to further grow the global
competitiveness of the nanotechnology industries there.

All of these ONAMI partners came together with several goals in mind: to attract
federal  research  investments  in  the  Oregon  and  Pacific  Northwest;  to  provide  an
outstanding collaborative environment for researchers who are at the forefront of in-
novation in their fields; to increase the impact of this research on Oregon industry;
to  develop  superior  workforce  talent—especially  growth  in  Ph.D.s;  and  to  spin  out
the  innovations  and  new  companies  that  will  provide  the  high-wage  jobs  of  the  fu-
ture.

At your request, I am providing to you today responses to the questions you posed
examining the challenges and opportunities related to nanotechnology, based on our
experiences  at  Oregon  State  University  and  with  the  Oregon  Nanoscience  and
Microtechnologies Institute (ONAMI).
• How do Oregon State University (OSU) and the Oregon Nanoscience and
Microtechnologies  Institute  (ONAMI)  interface  with  the  private  sector?
What are the greatest barriers to increased academic/industrial coopera-
tion in nanotechnology?
In  Oregon,  the  cooperation  OSU  and  our  other  academic  partners  have  with  pri-
vate  sector  via  ONAMI  is  unprecedented.  Perhaps  most  notably,  Hewlett-Packard
developed  a  very  comprehensive  inter-institutional  agreement  with  OSU.  As  a  part
of  this  partnership,  HP  donated  the  use  of  a  building  on  their  campus  in  Corvallis,
Oregon to accelerate the startup facility. This was a remarkable display of corporate
citizenship. This facility serves as a product development space for new ONAMI-re-
lated  companies  while  the  three  universities  complete  construction  of  additional
ONAMI  research  facilities.  HP  donated  the  three-year  lease  of  the  building,  valued
at  $2  million.  The  construction  of  new  facilities,  currently  underway,  is  primarily
funded through gifts and state appropriations.

ONAMI  Board  members  include  senior  executives  from  some  of  the  world’s  lead-
ing nanotechnology companies: Hewlett Packard, FEI Company (the world leader in
tools  for  nanotechnology,  based  in  Hillsboro,  Oregon),  LSI  Logic  and  Nantero  (a
partnership  with  a  focus  on  nanotechnology-based  semiconductor  memory  develop-
ment,  based  in  Gresham,  Oregon),  Pixelworks  (the  fourth  fastest  growing  company
in  the  U.S.),  and  Battelle  (the  operator  of  five  national  laboratories).  The  ONAMI
board is chaired by a general partner of the state’s leading venture capital firm and
ONAMI has relationships with many others in the investment community. ONAMI’s
sponsored  research  includes  research  collaborations  with  HP,  FEI,  LSI,  Nantero,
Xerox,  many  smaller  companies,  and  Intel.  In  several  cases,  we  are  able  to  work
with  industry  research  and  production  facilities  that  are  far  superior  to  anything
most  universities  typically  acquire.  ONAMI  also  has  a  physical  joint  venture  with
PNNL/Battelle,  which  is  a  unique  asset  for  not  only  performing  cutting  edge  re-
search,  but  translating  that  research  into  new  products,  new  companies,  and  high-
wage jobs.

At  Oregon  State  University,  I  also  want  to  mention  other  efforts  that  keep  the
university connected to industry. In our College of Engineering, we have a very suc-
cessful 
internship  program,  the  Multiple  Engineering  Cooperative  Program
(MECOP).  This  internship  experience  is  so  sophisticated  it  bears  little  resemblance
to  the  ordinary  internships  that  are  increasingly  common  in  higher  education.
MECOP is, and has been since its inception more than 20 years ago, self-supporting.
Dues  are  paid  by  participating  businesses  and  industry  to  support  the  staff  needed
to develop, monitor and fine-tune the program. The program is built on a high order
of industry interaction with the university and its students; and it is continually im-
proved  as  the  University  adjusts  its  curriculum  on  recommendations  made  by  the
industry  partners.  Participating  industries  include  Freightliner,  Boeing,  Sun
Microsytems,  Tektronix  and  many,  many  others.  Additionally,  as  at  other  institu-
tions,  OSU  faculty  are  engaged  in  industry  funded  R&D,  some  researchers  utilize

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

their  sabbatical  leave  to  gain  private  industry  experience  and  others  take  leaves  of
absence to help start up new companies.

While  our  ties  to  private  industry  are  strong,  there  are  existing  barriers  to  col-
laboration. The first is industry’s need to own the intellectual property rights on re-
search  they  pay  for,  which  can  be  in  direct  conflict  with  faculty  and  student  needs
to publish their work, as well as, in some instances, public information laws. An ad-
ditional  barrier  is  the  proprietary  nature  of  private  business  strategic  plans  and
their  internal  efforts  to  achieve  them.  It  is  often  difficult  for  academic  researchers
to  know  if  their  work  is  relevant  to  industry  needs  when  industry  is  trying  to  pro-
tect  their  product  development  efforts  to  ensure  they  are  developing  unique  and
competitive products for the marketplace.

Academic  and  research  funding  traditions  and  cultures  have  traditionally  not  re-
warded  (through  promotion,  tenure,  peer  reputation)  researchers  for  working  in
teams, performing industrially relevant research, patenting their inventions, or com-
mercialization.  In  addition,  unpredictable  funding  processes  in  both  industry  and
academia also present challenges. Industry also is subject to frequent organizational
restructuring involving staff turnover and reassignment.

The  lack  of  research  funding  for  joint  industry/university  research  is  a  critical
barrier  and  has  slowed  down  several  promising  opportunities.  While  larger  busi-
nesses  typically  have  some  kind  of  R&D  budget,  this  is  not  the  case  for  smaller,
emerging  businesses.  Generally  there  is  a  lack  of  university  funding  for  what  the
military  calls  ‘‘6.2’’  research,  research  that  seeks  the  application  of  basic  science.
The  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF)  funds  nearly  exclusively  basic  science  and
does not typically fund development. The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agen-
cy (DARPA) is the best source for university 6.2 funding, but this often is for highly
specialized devices with military applications and without a strong commercial mar-
ket.  ONAMI  researchers  have  expressed  a  need  for  a  source  of  funding  that  could
be seen as ‘‘a DARPA’’ for commercial nanotechnology.
• How  does  the  State  of  Oregon  provide  support  to  OSU  and  ONAMI  for
nanotechnology and other high-technology activities? How does this com-
plement  funding  from  the  Federal  Government  and  the  private  sector?
What, if any, gaps remain?
With  unprecedented  focus  and  consensus,  Oregon  has  chosen  to  focus  on
Nanoscience  and  Microtechnologies  as  the  state’s  first  ‘‘signature  research  center’’,
based  on  a  clear  finding  that  this  represented  the  greatest  overlap  of  (1)  existing
research  excellence,  (2)  future  market  opportunity,  and  (3)  Oregon’s  existing  indus-
trial  strengths.  In  2003,  the  State  committed  $21  million  to  ONAMI,  and  the  Gov-
ernor included $7 million in the proposed state budget for 2005–6. In addition, there
is a dedicated State of Oregon Innovation Economy Officer, a proposed statutory Or-
egon  Innovation  Council,  and  state-assisted  mechanisms  to  increase  the  supply  of
venture  capital  by  almost  $140M,  of  which  over  $30M  will  be  pre-seed  and  seed
stage. The state’s role is to assist the research institutions in increasing their capac-
ity  for  competitive  sponsored  research  and  to  assist  entrepreneurs  in  commer-
cializing new technology.

Industry  support  of  ONAMI’s  operation  since  its  inception  has  totaled  approxi-
mately $10 million in equipment, facilities use commitments, R&D, and gifts. Other
research  awards  have  totaled  approximately  $25  million,  including  federal  awards
from  the  Department  of  Defense  and  NSF,  as  well  as  foundation  awards.  Oregon
State University’s commitment thus far, outside of the specified state appropriations
for ONAMI, is estimated to be approximately $3 million.

Again, the gap between State, federal and private support is in support for inves-
tigations  in  technologies  that  are  beyond  the  basic  research,  but  not  quite  ready  to
be  tested  for  commercialization.  Smaller  businesses  often  simply  do  not  have  re-
search budgets to support these needs, and government funding for this stage of in-
quiry is not widely available.
• What is the workforce outlook for nanotechnology, and how can the Fed-
eral  Government  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  peo-
ple with the relevant skills to meet the Nation’s needs for nanotechnology
research  and  development  and  for  the  manufacture  of  nanotechnology-
enabled products?
During  the  December  2004  Oregon  Leadership  Summit  Steve  Grant  ,Vice  Presi-
dent for the Technology & Manufacturing Group at Intel Corporation reported that,
‘‘Over  the  last  four  years,  Intel  has  hired  441  PhD’s  in  engineering  and  computer
science  in  Oregon.  Only  seven  came  from  the  Oregon  University  System.  [Intel]
hired 347 Master’s degree engineers and only 11 percent came from Oregon schools.
At  the  Bachelor  degree  level  [they]  did  better,  with  21  percent.’’  Oregon  is  not  pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

ducing  enough  highly  skilled  quality  engineers  to  meet  our  hiring  needs,  especially
at the graduate levels. However, this is not just the case in Oregon, it is a problem
nationwide.

Increased  barriers  to  American  colleges  and  universities  for  foreign  students,  as
well  as  greatly  enhanced  opportunities  for  them  at  home,  and  a  lack  of  progress  in
filling the pipeline with qualified American students are trends in direct opposition
to  an  increased  need  for  workers  with  advanced  degrees  in  physical  sciences  and
engineering.  Without  a  trained  workforce,  the  United  States  will  find  it  hard  to  re-
main  a  leader  in  nanotechnology.  Further,  intense  global  competition  has  reduced
industry’s  investment  in  scientific  research,  while  the  Federal  Government  invest-
ment in research that will lead to technology-based economic development has stag-
nated. This is a confluence of unfavorable trends.

I  know  you  have  heard  this  message  repeatedly,  but  federal  funds  for  physical
science  and  engineering  are  a  part  of  what  is  needed  to  address  the  work  force
issue. In the end, faculty and graduate students go where the money is and funding
for  nanotechnology  research  is  critical  for  producing  the  graduate  level  workforce
that nanotechnology-based industry needs. Since World War II, the Federal Govern-
ment  has  supported  training  grants  and  research  assistantships  hand-in-hand  with
support for basic research. The combination of study and training is a successful av-
enue to train a highly educated workforce.

We also need a greater emphasis on curriculum development at all levels with se-
rious  research  on  what  academic  skills  are  needed  for  the  emerging  technologies,
best  practices  in  science  and  engineering  education  need  to  be  identified  and  dis-
seminated throughout the academic community.

What  is  also  critical  is  inspiring  young  students,  in  elementary  school,  high
school,  and  as  undergraduates  to  see  themselves  as  scientists  and  to  be  exposed  to
exciting new and multi-disciplinary trends. We need more students to find scientific
concepts practical and approachable and we need to inspire them to consider careers
in science. At Oregon State University, we are host to numerous outreach programs
that  try  to  get  the  attention  of  future  scientists  and  engineers.  Many  of  these  pro-
grams,  too,  are  federally  funded,  such  as  the  NSF  GK–12  graduate  fellowship  pro-
gram,  and  the  NASA  Space  Grant  program,  and  I  encourage  you  to  continue  to  in-
vest  in  these  activities  and  to  work  toward  ensuring  that  they  are  administered  in
a  way  that  ensures  their  effectiveness.  I  also  think  that  there  should  be  ways  to
encourage novel curricular changes.
• How can Federal and State governments, industry, and academia best co-

operate to facilitate advances in nanotechnology?
It is generally recognized that university-based research is a long-term investment
in  the  future.  The  Federal  Government’s  support  for  basic  research  contributes  to
the  discoveries  and  innovation  that  underpins  the  future  technologies  and  knowl-
edge  that  contribute  to  the  well-being  of  our  nation.  However,  as  our  scientists  get
involved in areas of research, such as nanotechnology, where there are demands for
near-term delivery, many challenges emerge.

In order to facilitate advances in these areas, one possible solution is to establish
federal funding sources that set clear objectives related to translation of technology
and  economic  development,  put  in  place  metrics  to  measure  progress  against  these
goals, and hold recipients of funding accountable for achieving outcomes. While this
is  not  an  appropriate  direction  to  take  with  basic  research,  there  are  ways  to  des-
ignate a certain percentage of publicly funded research for multi-disciplinary teams
focused  on  big  and  emerging  fields  with  a  potential  for  translation  and  commer-
cialization. An example of this is the NIH Roadmap Initiative and the National Can-
cer Institute (NCI) National Cooperative Drug Discovery Programs (NCDDGs).

As  I  noted  earlier,  three  words  describe  ONAMI:  innovation,  collaboration,  and
commercialization.  If  Federal  and  State  governments,  industry,  and  academia  can
all keep these in mind as they examine avenues to advance nanotechnology research
and  development,  it  is  the  public  that  will  benefit  from  individuals  who  can  take
advantage  of  such  devices  as  compact,  portable,  home  kidney  dialysis  devices  to
communities  which  experience  economic  prosperity  with  the  establishment  of  new
nanotechnology businesses and industry.

In  conclusion,  I  wish  to  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  address  you  today.
Nanotechnology  is  an  exciting  new  area  which  will  have  tremendous  impact  across
multiple  fields  of  science  and  throughout  many  aspects  of  our  lives.  We  are  excited
that  in  Oregon  we  have  been  able  to  develop  a  vision  for  significant  partnerships
such  as  ONAMI  and  that  private,  State,  federal  and  university  investments  have
made the vision a reality.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN M. CASSADY

John  M.  Cassady  received  a  B.A  degree  from  DePauw  University  in  1960  with  a
major  in  chemistry;  he  obtained  his  M.S.  degree  in  1962  and  his  Ph.D.  degree  in
1964  from  Western  Reserve  University  with  a  major  in  Organic  Chemistry.  Dr.
Cassady  was  an  NIH  postdoctoral  fellow  from  1965–1966  at  the  University  of  Wis-
consin where he worked under the direction of Dr. Morris Kupchan on the isolation
and  structural  elucidation  of  tumor  inhibitors  from  plants.  In  1966,  he  joined  the
faculty  of  the  School  of  Pharmacy,  Purdue  University  as  Assistant  Professor  in  the
Department of Medicinal Chemistry and Pharmacognosy. He was promoted to Asso-
ciate  Professor  in  1970  and  Professor  in  1974.  He  was  appointed  Associate  Head  of
the  Department  of  Medicinal  Chemistry  and  Pharmacognosy  in  1976  and  became
Head  of  the  Department  in  January  1980.  In  1987,  Dr.  Cassady  was  appointed  as
the  Glenn  L.  Jenkins  Distinguished  Professor  of  Medicinal  Chemistry  and  Phar-
macognosy  at  Ohio  State  University  College  of  Pharmacy.  On  July  1,  2003  he  re-
turned to the faculty after more than 15 years as Dean. Dr. Cassady was appointed
as Vice President for Research at Oregon State University, March 2005.

Dr. Cassady holds membership in the American Chemical Society, American Soci-
ety of Pharmacognosy (ASP), Academy of Pharmaceutical Sciences, British Chemical
Society, AACR, ASHP, AAAS, Sigma Xi, Rho Chi, and the AACP. He has served on
the nominating and publicity committees for the ASP, was scientific program chair-
man for the 1976 annual meeting of the Society, was elected to the Executive Com-
mittee  (1978–1981)  and  President  (1993–1994)  and  is  chair  of  the  ASP  Foundation
Board  (1995–present).  He  has  served  as  a  consultant  to  the  National  Institutes  of
Health  and  was  a  member  of  the  Bioorganic  and  Natural  Products  Study  Section
from  1980–1984.  He  has  served  on  the  Editorial  Advisory  Board  of  the  Journal  of
Natural  Products  and  the  Journal  of  Medicinal  Chemistry.  Dr.  Cassady  has  served
on the publicity, scientific program and awards committees for the Medicinal Chem-
istry Division of the American Chemical Society. He was appointed a member of the
Long-Range  Planning  Committee  of  the  Medicinal  Chemistry  Division  from  1983–
1986  and  in  1987  he  was  elected  Councilor  for  the  Medicinal  Chemistry  Division.
He  was  appointed  to  the  National  Association  of  Chain  Drug  Stores  (NACDS)  Na-
tional  Advisory  Council  from  1997–2002.  He  was  a  member  of  the  AACP  National
Commission  on  Graduate  Education  (1996–1998),  Chair  of  the  AACP  Institutional
Research Advisory Committee (1997–1998), and a member of the Ad Hoc Committee
on  Academic  Budgeting  and  Accountability  (1997–1998).  He  was  elected  AAAS
Chair-elect  for  the  Section  of  Pharmaceutical  Sciences  in  1997  and  served  as  Chair
from  1999–2000.  He  served  on  the  ASHP  Commission  on  Goals  in  2001  and  2002.
He currently serves on the Corporate Advisory Board of Pacific Northwest National
Laboratories (PNNL).

Dr.  Cassady’s  research  interests  involved  the  discovery  and  design  of  anticancer
drugs from natural products and nutraceuticals, specifically, the isolation, structural
elucidation,  and  chemical  studies  of  chemopreventive  and  antitumor  agents  from
higher  plants  and  the  synthesis  of  potential  antitumor  agents.  Other  areas  of  re-
search  interest  involved  the  design  of  enzyme  inhibitors,  including  protein  tyrosine
kinases,  synthesis  of  selective  dopamine  agonists  as  potential  antipsychotic  agents,
anti-malarial  and  anti-Parkinson’s  agents  from  natural  products.  His  research  re-
sulted in the publication of more than 150 manuscripts and 150 abstracts and over
$12,000,000  in  research  support  from  the  NIH  and  other  funding  agencies.  Dr.
Cassady  has  developed  strategic  alliances  between  academic  and  corporate  sectors.
He led a strategic alliance with Pharmacia, served on the Corporate Advisory Board
of  Yuhai  Phytochemicals,  China,  Dean’s  Advisory  Board  for  Merck-Medco  and  as  a
consultant for Gaia Botanicals, Leadscope, Milkhaus and SSCI.

Dr.  Cassady  was  elected  to  membership  in  the  Royal  Society  of  Chemistry  and
American Association for Advances in Cancer Research, was elected a Fellow of the
Academy of Pharmaceutical Sciences in 1979, a Fellow of the American Association
of Pharmaceutical Sciences in 1987 and a Fellow of the AAAS in 1990. Dr. Cassady
received  the  Purdue  University  Cancer  Research  Award  in  1981  and  the  Gisvold
Lecture  Award  from  the  University  of  Minnesota  in  1986.  In  June  1989,  he  was
awarded the D.Sc. (Hon.) by DePauw University. He received the Research Achieve-
ment award in Natural Products Chemistry from the American Pharmaceutical As-
sociation in 1990. In 1991, he was appointed Honorary Professor to the Institute of
Medicinal Plant Development by the Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Dr. Cassady.
Mr. Fancher.

STATEMENT  OF  MR.  MICHAEL  FANCHER,  DIRECTOR  OF  ECO-
NOMIC  OUTREACH,  ASSOCIATE  PROFESSOR  OF  NANOECO-
NOMICS, ALBANY NANOTECH
Mr.  FANCHER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the
House  Research  Subcommittee  on  the  Committee  on  Science.  I  am
appearing here today to provide our perspective on what we believe
is a new model for technology, business, and education that creates
what I would call a naturally occurring multiplier, or as PCAST re-
fers  to  it  as  the  innovation  cluster  with  academia,  governmental
agencies,  and  industry  each  contributing  and  benefiting  in  their
own way.

It  is  important  for  the  Science  Committee  to  understand  that
nanotechnology  is  emerging  from  the  discovery  phase  and  is  now
entering the commercialization stage and that the NNI must evolve
and  expand  its  funding  priorities  to  address  the  daunting  tech-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

nology,  business,  and  economic  challenges  confronting  the  Nation’s
high-tech industries.

As the promise of nanotechnology provides game-changing oppor-
tunities  in  a  variety  of  applications  as  being  better  defined,  as  we
heard  from  Scott  Donnelly,  it  is  becoming  increasingly  apparent
that  the  cost  to  commercialize  nanotechnology  is  rising  exponen-
tially.

Chairman INGLIS. Mr. Fancher, excuse me just a second.
Mr. FANCHER. Yes.
Chairman INGLIS. Do you want some slides up?
Mr. FANCHER. Yes, I am. This is just my intro.
Chairman INGLIS. Oh, okay.
Mr. FANCHER. Companies are seeking new models to collaborate.
What  I  would  like  to  do  is  just  provide  a  few  slides  to  describe

what that model is, and so please bear with me.

[Slide.]
I  think  it  is  helpful  to  understand  that—and  we  have  heard  al-
ready  that  Oregon  is  taking  the—New  York—the  state  has  gotten
involved in this, and New York State has, I think, done it in a way
that  I  think  can  be  replicated  around  the  country.  And  when  you
look at the strategy New York State is focused on, it has been four
key  drivers:  selecting  an  overarching  discipline,  such  as
nanotechnology,  investing  in  state-of-the-art  infrastructure,  focus-
ing on world-class, hands-on education and training, not just Ph.D.
and Masters in Engineering, but the whole supply chain, and then,
of course, leverage public-private partnerships.

I would like to just spend a slide on each to give you an example.
[Slide.]
Well,  nanochips.  We  have  already  heard  about  it.  Nanochips  are
enabling  defense,  bio-health,  sensors,  aerospace,  pervasive  tether-
free computing, communications, energy, and of course, automotive
industry. I think the key element here, though, is the nanochip in-
dustry  is  probably  the  first  industry  that  has  begun  integrating
nanotechnology into a high-yield, low-cost production process mode.
That  means  they  are  breaking  the  ground  for  other  industries  to
adapt  that  technology,  that  process  technology,  to  a  variety  of  ap-
plications.
[Slide.]
A  key  driver,  too,  for  New  York  State  has  been  investment  in
state-of-the-art  infrastructure.  This  is  the  Albany  NanoTech  com-
plex.  It  will  be  at  about  $3  billion  in  assets  by  the  end  of  2006  in
addition  to  the  facilities  that  you  see  there.  We  have  around
750,000  square  feet  of  cutting-edge  facilities  with  85,000  square
feet  of  clean  rooms  for  what  is  known  as  ‘‘300-millimeter  wafer
process  technology.’’  That  is  important  because  300-millimeter  is
the state-of-the-art of technology used by the computer chip indus-
try.  And  it  will  be  the  platform  on  which  nanotechnology  is  inte-
grated  for  a  variety  of  those  applications  that  I  already  described.
Our partners include Sematech, IBM, AMD, Micron, Tokyo Elec-
tron,  General  Electric,  and  ASML.  We  have  200  researchers  at  Al-
bany  NanoTech  in  the  college  and  300  industry  scientists  on  site,
and  by  the  end  of  2007,  we  will  have  around  1,600  people  in  the
complex.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

I  would  like  to  spend  just  two  slides  on  workforce,  because  I

think that is a particularly important challenge.

[Slide.]
And  with  that  we  have  established  the  world’s  first  college  of
nanoscale  science  and  engineering.  We  have  constellations  in
nanoscience,  nano-engineering,  nano-biotechnology,  and  nano-eco-
nomics, of which I am Associate Professor in that school.

I  think  when  you  look  at  the  challenge  for  the  workforce,  what
you are looking at, and I am quoting the National Science Founda-
tion, is that the United States will need two million nanotech-savvy
workers  by  the  year  2014.  That  is  a  daunting  challenge  when  you
consider  that  China  is  producing  250,000  engineers  and  scientists
per  year  while  we  are  producing  56,000  engineers  and  scientists,
and I take that number from the American Electronics Association.
When  you  look  at  the  breakdown  of  that  two  million,  20  percent
will be scientists, and 80 percent will be the engineers, technicians,
operators, business leaders, etc. So that means we need to start fo-
cusing  on  children  10  to  17  years  old  right  now  if  we  are  going  to
make that objective.

I  would  like  to  give  a  case  in  point  on  what  Albany  NanoTech
has  been  doing  in  the  College  of  Nanoscale  Science  and  Engineer-
ing to meet those workforce needs.

Well, as I have said, we have established the world’s first college
to  break  the  walls  down  between  the  sciences  so  that  everyone  is
talking  common  language  between  biology,  computational  science,
physics, and chemistry. We have established partnerships with our
community  colleges,  supporting  the  semiconductor  manufacturing
technology training program for the operators of the tools. We have
high  school  and  undergraduates  doing  internships  in  the  program.
And  we  also  host  the  semiconductor  equipment  materials  inter-
national  workforce  development  institute,  what  we  call  a  ‘‘chip
camp.’’  It  is  a  four-day  exposure  for  your  vocational  students.  And
then  finally,  we  have  established  a  $6  million  center  for  the  con-
struction trades.

Again,  I  think  what  is  important  to  understand  is  that  atomic-
scale  manufacturing,  if  pushing  all  levels  in  the  workforce  to  rise
to  new  levels  of  expertise  and  training  right  down  to  the  construc-
tion  of  the  building  to  hooking  up  the  equipment  is  all  now  very
critical to the success of the overall commercialization.

The  third  driver  for  New  York  State  has  been  establishing  the
Center  of  Excellence  in  Nano-electronics  by  Governor  Pataki  back
in 2001. This has been—and I am just doing this as a timeline, but
it  has  been  critical  to  provide  the  infrastructure  and  partnerships
with industry, with the SAI, with the focus center, IBM, the anchor
tenant,  and  the  Center  of  Excellence  with  $150  million.  We  have
a  Sematech  North  program,  Tokyo  Electron  R&D  center,  the  first
established outside of Japan is embedded in our facilities. Our com-
plex  was  completed  about  a  year  ago.  Albany  NanoTech  was
formed.  We  have  established  the  first  college.  We  recently  an-
nounced  the  $400  million  research  center  with  ASML,  one  of  the
world  leaders  in  lithography  equipment.  And  then  finally,  we  are
closing  on  what  we  call  the  Center  for  Semiconductor  Research,  a
partnership with Applied Materials, which is about $450 million.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

So  I  would  like  to  take  that  focus  of  where  we  are,  and  now  let

42

us go take it to the global marketplace.

I think it is important for you to understand that our competition
is  very  steep,  and  it  is  global,  and  that  what  is  happening  in  the
nanochip  world  is  global  alliances.  And  when  you  look  at  what  is
going  on  in  Albany,  you  are  seeing  a  partnership  that  initially
started  with  AMD,  Sematech,  and  IBM  and  has  now  grown  to
Sony, Toshiba, and Chartered Semiconductor. Our competition is in
Belgium. It is IMEK. It includes SD Phillips, and a few other com-
panies, TSMC, and Motorola, and then, of course, Japan.

The global R&D competition drives the industry clustering effect
that  PCAST  mentioned.  And  for  New  York  State,  we  have  already
achieved  $8  billion  of  investment  just  since  2002.  I  think  two——

Chairman INGLIS. Mr. Fancher.
Mr. FANCHER. Yes.
Chairman INGLIS. Hold on just a second.
Mr. FANCHER. Okay.
Chairman  INGLIS.  We  are  expecting  votes  at  11:15,  so  we  prob-

ably need to move a little quickly.

Mr. FANCHER. Okay.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Fancher follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL FANCHER

A Successful New Paradigm for Innovation and Education

University based, co-located with some of the biggest names in industrial innova-
tion, and committed to building a thriving, educated and globally-competitive work-
force, Albany NanoTech is a $3 billion enterprise dedicated to creating partnerships
for  leading  edge  nanotechnology  innovations.  Through  its  unique,  vertically-inte-
grated model that includes the world’s first College for Nanoscale Sciences and En-
gineering  at  the  University  at  Albany—State  University  of  New  York,  Albany
NanoTech’s partnerships with business, government and academia have created the
world’s  premier  powerhouse  for  research,  development,  technology  deployment,  and
education resource supporting accelerated nanotechnology commercialization.

Albany  NanoTech  is  the  umbrella  under  which  the  CNSE  and  the  five  Centers
operate;  namely,  the  Center  of  Excellence  in  Nanoelectronics,  Center  for  Advanced
Technology  in  Nanomaterials  and  Nanoelectronics,  Interconnect  Focus  Center,
Nanoscale Metrology and Imaging Center, and the Energy and Environmental Tech-
nology Applications Center. The CNSE and the five centers are all located at Albany
NanoTech  and  have  access  to  its  facilities,  but  the  nature  of  our  model—through
which  there  are  no  divisions  between  disciplines,  or  between  academia  and  indus-
try—means  that  there  is  great  cooperation  and  cross-pollination  among  the  various
centers and between CNSE faculty and industrial partners. Faculty are involved in
all of the centers and in some cases, the centers cooperate closely with one another
to  advance  the  science.  Nobody  is  working  in  silos,  and  that  is  part  of  the  reason
why we have been able to get so much accomplished.
Partnerships
How does Albany NanoTech interface with the private sector?

Albany  NanoTech  seeks  to  leverage  resources  in  partnership  with  business,  gov-
ernment,  and  academia  to  create  jobs  and  economic  growth  for  nanoelectronics-re-
lated  industries.  Governor  George  E.  Pataki  created  a  Center  of  Excellence  in
Nanoelectronics  at  Albany  NanoTech’s  facilities  in  2001  and  since  then  has  worked
very  closely  on  building  relationships  with 
in
nanoelectronics like IBM, ASML, Tokyo Electron, and International Sematech. Since
2001,  we  have  attracted  over  $1  billion  in  direct  private  investment  and  now  have
over  100  industrial  partners  many  of  whom  are  on-site,  which  represent  companies
of all sizes that share a commitment to nanotechnology innovation.

industrial  players 

Boasting  over  100  partnerships  with  universities,  federal  labs,  and  industry  such
as RPI, Stony Brook University, Argonne National Laboratory, DARPA, NASA, Gen-

leading 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

eral Electric, Honeywell, and IBM, to name a few, Albany NanoTech strives to help
companies  overcome  technical,  market,  and  business  development  barriers  through
technology  incubation,  pilot  prototyping,  and  testbed  integration  support  leading  to
targeted deployment of nanotechnology-based products.

Albany  NanoTech’s  partnerships  encompass  multi-year  research  programs  with
IBM,  ASML,  Tokyo  Electron,  Applied  Materials,  Infineon  and  Micron  as  well  as
sponsored research collaborations with national defense agencies, such as the Naval
Research  Laboratory  and  DARPA  as  well  as  start-up  companies,  such  as  Daystar
Systems and Crystal IS. Small, medium and large corporate and university partners
have  access  to  state-of-the-art  laboratories,  shared  user  facilities,  supercomputing
capabilities,  and  an  array  of  research  and  development  centers  serving  the  short-
,  medium-,  and  long-term  nanotechnology  development  needs  while  training  the
workforce  for  the  21st  century.  Partners  are  able  to  collaborate  formally  and  infor-
mally,  establish  strategic  alliances,  or  form  joint  ventures  and  consortia  within  a
technically aggressive and financially competitive environment.
The CNSE & Centers
What is the workforce outlook for nanotechnology, and how can the Federal Govern-
ment  and  universities  help  ensure  there  will  be  enough  people  with  the  relevant
skills  to  meet  the  Nation’s  needs  for  nanotechnology  research  and  development
and for the manufacture of nanotechnology-enabled products?

According  to  National  Science  Foundation,  the  U.S.  will  need  approximately  two
million nanotech savvy workers by 2014. Approximately 20 percent of these workers
are  expected  to  be  scientists,  80  percent  must  be  highly-skilled  engineers,  techni-
cians, business leaders, economists, etc., and that means children between the ages
of  10  and  17  need  to  be  educated  NOW  about  the  field  that  will  define  their  job
market as adults.

The  location  of  the  College  in  the  Albany  NanoTech  complex  provides  students
with  a  unique  public-private  education  through  research  partnerships  that  are  not
available  at  any  other  college  or  university.  This  partnership  allows  maximum
leveraging  of  synergistic  resources  to  create  a  comprehensive,  fully  integrated  pow-
erhouse  for  the  attraction  and  retention  of  highly  qualified  students  to  careers  in
the  various  disciplines  of  nanotechnology,  from  theoretical  principles  to  experi-
mental demonstrations and practical applications.

As  the  first  of  its  kind,  the  College  provides  a  comprehensive  education  of  the
highest quality enabling the discovery and dissemination of fundamental knowledge
concepts  and  new  frontier  scientific  principles  in  the  emerging  interdisciplinary
fields of nanotechnology, from nanosciences and nanoengineering to nanoeconomics.
The College offers Ph.D. and M.S. degrees in the science and engineering tracks per-
taining  to  the  nanoelectronics,  opto-electronic,  optical,  nano/micro-electro-mechan-
ical,  nano/micro-opto-electro-mechanical,  energy,  and  nanobiological  fields  with  cur-
riculum  integrating  the  fundamental  science  principles  of  physics,  chemistry,  com-
putational  science  and  biology  with  the  cross  cutting  fields  of  nanosciences,
nanoengineering and nanotechnology.

In addition, the College supports hands-on workforce training by providing access
to  state-of-the-art  facilities,  training  the  entire  spectrum  of  technicians,  operators
and  technical  trades  through  partnerships  with  community  colleges,  high  schools
and leading industry players. CNSE has established partnerships with several com-
munity  colleges  providing  the  hands-on  workforce  component  to  their  associate  de-
gree  education  necessary  to  operate  nanotechnology  equipment.  The  CNSE  works
with  local  undergraduate  colleges  and  high  schools  by  sponsoring  year  round  and
summer  internships  for  students  and  by  hosting  in  partnership  with  the  Semicon-
ductor  Equipment  and  Materials  International  (SEMI)  four  day  ‘‘chip  camps’’  tar-
geting  high  school  vocational  students  to  encourage  then  to  consider  carriers  in
nanotechnology  through  hands-on  curriculum.  Finally,  Albany  NanoTech  partici-
pates in a $6 million workforce training partnership for nanotech infrastructure con-
struction  trades  in  partnership  with  M+W  Zander,  one  of  the  world  leaders  in
nanotechnology facility design and construction, the Watervliet Arsenal Partnership
and New York State.
Research & Facilities

The  research  performed  at  Albany  NanoTech  is  broadly  focused  on  all  aspects  of
the  emerging  nanosciences  including:  nanoelectronics  and  microelectronics,  Nano/
Microsystems  including  MEMS,  nanometrology,  nanophotonics  and  opto-electronics,
analytical  sciences  and  process  control,  nanopower,  and  advanced  computer  mod-
eling for nanosystems and processes.

To assist in accomplishing these prominent research goals, Albany NanoTech con-
sists of over 500,000 square feet of on-site office, laboratory, and cleanroom incuba-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

tion  facilities.  The  complex  includes  the  only  200mm/300mm  wafer  facilities  in  the
academic  world  that  encompasses  nanoelectronics;  system-on-a-chip  technologies;
biochips;  opto-electronics  and  photonics  devices;  closed-loop  sensors  for  monitoring,
detection, and protection; and ultra-high-speed communication components.

Albany  NanoTech  has  literally  hundreds  of  tools,  ranging  from  STMs  and  super-
computers  to  the  ASML  TWINSCAN  AT:1500i  scanner,  the  world’s  first  300mm
wafer  immersion  lithography  tool.  Our  tool  arsenal  is  one  of  our  best  recruiting
tools, since many of our scientists can do everything they need to advance their re-
search right here.

NanoFab 300 South, which opened in January 2003, is a 138,000-square-foot tech-
nology acceleration facility that provides for business incubation, classrooms for the
CNSE, workforce training, offices for Albany NanoTech, and large and small indus-
trial  sponsors  and  partners  including  IBM,  TEL,  Honeywell,  and  SEMATECH
North.  The  facility  also  includes  16,000  square  feet  of  cleanroom  to  support  the
SEMATECH North, IBM, and other next-generation nanotechnology research activi-
ties.

the  nanoelectronics-related 

Scheduled  to  be  completed  by  the  end  of  2005,  NanoFab  300-North  features  a
35,000  square  foot  Class  1-capable  300mm  wafer  R&D  cleanroom,  pilot  prototype,
incubation,  and  workplace  training  facility  that  will  house  a  full  nanoelectronics
process  line.  The  500,000+  square-foot  complex  includes  over  65,000  square  feet  of
cleanroom  space  supporting 
industries.  Albany
NanoTech  not  only  has  the  site  where  the  world’s  first  300mm  wafer  immersion  li-
thography  tool  was  installed  in  August  2004,  enabling  partners  like  IBM  to  get  a
jump on this technology but Sematech has also announced that it is conducting the
bulk  of  its  research  in  extreme  ultraviolet  (EUV)  lithography  at  its  laboratories  lo-
cated  at  Albany  NanoTech.  The 
in
nanotechnology  research—IBM  and  Sematech—have  both  announced  major  lithog-
raphy  research  milestones  in  the  past  year  and  both  of  these  took  place  at  Albany
NanoTech demonstrates the effectiveness of the model.
The NY ‘‘Nano’’ State
How  does  the  State  of  New  York  provide  support  to  Albany  NanoTech  and  the  Col-
lege  of  Nanoscale  Science  and  Engineering  at  UAlbany–SUNY?  How  does  this
complement funding from the Federal Government and the private sector? What,
if any, gaps remain?

leading  organizations 

fact  that  two 

Government 

support 

and  public 

New York and its industrial partners committed over $1.4 billion to establish five
in  nanoelectronics,  photonics,
Centers  of  Excellence  throughout  the  State 
bioinformatics,  information  technology,  and  environmental  systems.  Each  Center  of
Excellence  acts  as  a  bridge  between  scientific  discovery  and  commercialization  by
supporting  pilot-prototyping  development,  workforce  training  and  economic  out-
reach. Combined, these distributed technology deployment centers represent a com-
prehensive nanotechnology commercialization effort reflecting regional strengths.
investment 

in
nanotechnology is a key to industry success and future economic growth. New York’s
tremendous  support  of  nanotechnology  development  has  caused  industry  leaders
such  as  IBM,  General  Electric,  and  Corning  to  expand  their  research  and  develop-
ment  activities  within  the  state.  New  York  State’s  support  for  joint  technology  re-
search, development and deployment in the form of state-of-the-art facilities and ca-
pabilities  has  played  an  important  role  in  lowering  the  risk  and  cost  for  companies
to accelerate the commercialization of nanotechnology.

encouraging  private 

New York State already shows signs of being a ‘Nano Hub’ and, in particular, the
capital  region  is  becoming  the  world’s  first  ‘Nanopolis.’  Since  2002,  two  of  the
world’s  most  influential  tool  suppliers,  Tokyo  Electron  and  ASML,  have  chosen  to
open  up  their  first  cutting-edge  R&D  laboratories  outside  their  home  countries  at
Albany  NanoTech.  Smaller  high-tech  startups  like  Starfire  Technologies  and  Evi-
dent  Technologies  that  were  incubated  at  Albany  are  growing  and  attracting  ven-
ture  capital  funding.  Finally,  we  are  finding  companies  are  actually  moving  to  Al-
bany from other parts of the world.
The Future & Recommendations

Albany NanoTech’s overarching goal is to become the Bell Labs of the new millen-
nium—bringing the best minds together, whether they are in industry, government
or  academia,  to  work  on  leading-edge  technologies  that  can  revolutionize  our  lives
in  the  coming  decades.  In  the  immediate  term,  this  means  building  partnerships
and creating a paradigm that practically compels companies that value leading-edge
nanotechnology research to establish partnerships at Albany NanoTech if they want
to  remain  competitive.  In  the  long-term,  it  means  re-inventing  and  drastically
speeding how innovation is brought to market.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

The College’s goals are to completely redefine how scientists are educated by tear-
ing  down  the  traditional  disciplinary  silos  in  which  they  operate  and  by  tearing
down  the  barriers  between  the  research  institutions,  community  colleges,  high
schools,  vocational  schools  and  even  the  trades.  We  are  confident  that  subjects  like
biology,  chemistry,  physics  and  medicine  will  become  increasingly  irrelevant  in  the
coming  decades  as  science  merges  around  the  development  of  tool  sets  and  meth-
odologies.  In  the  immediate  term,  we  want  CNSE  to  be  part  of  this  redefinition  of
research and pedagogy. In the long term, we aspire to create a world-class academic
center  on  par  with—but  not  a  clone  of—the  world’s  greatest  research  universities.
Atomic-scale manufacturing requires a closer coupling between research, develop-
ment and manufacturing. A new generation of institutions executing dynamic cross-
industry,  cross  disciplinary  models  are  emerging,  such  as  Albany  NanoTech,  that
are  responding 
the  unique  challenges  and  opportunities  created  by
nanotechnology. These institutions are establishing a new paradigm for state-of-the-
art  research,  education  and  technology  deployment  that  offers  the  Federal  Govern-
ment a highly leveraged return on its investment in projects, programs and centers.
Federal  funding  must  recognize  the  emergence  of  new  university-based  tech-
nology,  educational,  and  business  models  that  concurrently  support  long-term  re-
search,  medium-term  development  and  short-term  manufacturing.  Federal  funding
should  reward  universities  and  state  governments  who  successfully  pursue  new
paradigms for innovation and education by encouraging joint investments in shared-
use  infrastructure  by  industry.  Federal  investments  in  shared-use  infrastructure
supporting the entire continuum of nanotechnology research, development and man-
ufacturing  must  be  a  strategic  priority  supporting.  New  business  and  technology
models  such  as  Albany  NanoTech’s  is  critical  for  U.S.  industry  to  convert
nanotechnology  discovery  into  commercial  opportunities  supporting  national  indus-
trial competitiveness and defense and security priorities.

to 

Shared  investment  and  collaboration  by  industry,  academia  and  government  not
only  improves  the  probability  of  success,  leading  to  economic  growth  for  both  small
and  large  companies,  but  also  provides  the  critical  infrastructure  necessary  to  sup-
port educational programs for the entire spectrum of workers to effectively compete
in  the  21st  Century.  Significant  and  consistent  support  for  the  operations  of  this
university-based shared-use infrastructure by the Federal Government is critical for
supporting  the  growth  of  small,  medium  and  large  companies,  training  the  entire
spectrum  of  nanotech  savvy  workers  with  hands-on  educational  programs,  and
achieving the grand challenges set forth under the National Nanotechnology Initia-
tive  (NNI)  which  are  critical  for  national  defense,  public  health  and  economic  secu-
rity. More specifically, continued support for the NNI should be a priority while rec-
ognizing  that  current  programs  neither  effectively  address  nor  accommodate  less
traditional models, and as such, requires a new category of funding to support ‘‘Suc-
cessful New Paradigms for Innovation and Education.’’

For more information about Albany NanoTech, its mission and its programs, visit
our website at www.albanynanotech.org or contact Michael Fancher, Director of Eco-
nomic Outreach at mfancher@uamail.albany.edu.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

BIOGRAPHY FOR MICHAEL FANCHER

Michael  Fancher  has  been  the  Director  for  Economic  Outreach  at  Albany
NanoTech, University at Albany—SUNY for over six years. During that time he has
supported  the  development  of  partnerships  with  high  technology  companies,  indus-
try  consortia,  governmental  entities,  research  institutions,  private  financing  and
not-for-profit  organizations.  Specifically,  he  identifies  opportunities  to  leverage  fi-
nancial,  technological  and  market  development  resources  by  formulating  strategic
application-specific  and  technology-driven  development  programs.  Michael  also  sup-
ports  the  business  acceleration  initiatives  by  coordinating  federal,  State  and  local
financial and technical assistance programs for high technology business enterprises
through  each  stage  of  technology  commercialization.  Mr.  Fancher  holds  a  Master’s
degree  (international  economics-finance)  from  the  University  at  Albany-SUNY,  an
undergraduate degree in business administration (accounting & finance) from Syra-
cuse University and is a Certified Public Accountant in New York State.

Prior  to  joining  Albany  NanoTech,  Michael  served  as  Deputy  Budget  Director  for
the New York State Assembly Ways and Means Committee overseeing project devel-
opment financing and program policy structures supporting university research, re-
gional  infrastructure,  energy  industry  restructuring,  public  &  private  construction
projects, environmental protection, procurement reform, transportation capital plan-
ning  &  industry  regulatory  issues.  He  was  awarded  the  Governor’s  commendations
for legislative achievement supporting business competitiveness and project develop-
ment financing.

As  a  Certified  Public  Accountant,  Michael  has  provided  audit,  tax  and  financial
planning services for business formation, expansion, merger and acquisitions and is
experienced in financial and economic modeling.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

DISCUSSION

Chairman  INGLIS.  But  while  you  have  got  that  slide  up,  let  me

ask you the first question, if I may.

Mr. FANCHER. Yes.
Chairman INGLIS. You were actually in the process of answering
a question that I had, and perhaps others on the panel have, which
is  where  is  our  main  competition?  Who  should  we  be  concerned
about?

Mr.  FANCHER.  I  think,  when  you  look  at  the  competition  from
abroad,  you  are  seeing  the  European  Union  as  a  very  strong  block
that  invests  heavily  in  supporting  the  business—the  similar  model
as what is at Albany NanoTech. When you look at Asia and Japan,
they  also  have  formed  a  similar  model  in  Japan.  France  has  also
established in Grenoble, a similar model. So the model is validated,
I  think,  by—but  the  competition—and  the  focus  is  similar.  They
are  focusing  on  developing  the  expertise  in  this  process  technology
to  not  only  provide  a  platform  for  nanotechnology,  but  to  take  the
knowledge base of processing and apply it to rolling production for
photovoltaics, all types of different production of materials and sub-
strates.

Chairman INGLIS. That is helpful.
Mr.  Donnelly,  I  should  have  mentioned  that  we  are  extremely
happy to have General Electric in our District making gas turbines.
I saw that operation recently. Amazing that you can run gases over
those  rotors  that  are  the  higher—the  gases  are  being  at  a  higher
temperature than the melting point of the metal that comprises the
rotors. It is amazing.

So perhaps you—because you are in business at General Electric
to make products, tell us how we, in the Federal Government, and
folks like Dr. Kennedy in academia and Dr. Cassady, can help you
get  to  products.  What  can  we  best  do  here  in  government  and  in
the university to help you get a product into the marketplace?

Mr.  DONNELLY.  Well,  all  I  can  say  is  it  is  in  two  parts,  Mr.
Chairman. One is certainly students coming out of universities. So
again,  the  funding  that  goes  through  NSF,  you  know,  the  people
that  try  to  figure  out  how  to  make  those  materials  survive  beyond
their  melting  point,  which  is  actually  the  tricky  part  of  these  sys-
tems, is all of that intellectual capital. So the, you know, the talent
that we are able to bring in out of university systems on a constant
basis  to  design  that  next  generation  is  incredibly  important  to  us.
And  other  avenues  that  we  see  in  terms  of  the  federal  role  in
things  like  next  generation  aircraft  engines,  you  know,  it  is—you
can’t  state  the  importance  of  where  the  military  tends  to  go  with
things  like  JSF  engine  technology,  which  is  important,  obviously,
for  the  military  mission  perspective.  But  that  technology  then
floats and works its way down through our commercial aircraft en-
gines, our energy businesses, and things like that.

So I think when you look at the programs that the Federal Gov-
ernment  funds,  it  helps  to  pull  a  lot  of  these  very  high  perform-
ance,  leading-edge  technologies  that  might  first  show  up  in  a  mili-
tary  application  but  ultimately  work  their  way  into  a  commercial
application as well. The same is true in the energy area. If you look
at the DOE funding that is in place to help support and bring some

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

of these new technologies to the market, frankly, before they might
be economically suitable for wide-scale deployment, it is a very nec-
essary step to get that technology out on the marketplace and start
working  on  the  cost  and  validation  of  that,  which  ultimately  ends
in a very large business.

Chairman  INGLIS.  Okay.  Dr.  Kennedy,  what  do  you  think  we
could  do,  we,  in  the  Federal  Government,  could  do  to  help  you  ac-
complish your objectives of——

Dr.  KENNEDY.  I  feel  like  that  in  terms  of  translating—transfer-
ring  nanotechnology  into  companies,  you  need  graduate  students
that  have  broader  perspective  than  just  how  to  make  polymers  or
how  to  make  this  nano-material,  because  they  don’t  have  it—they
really don’t have a business experience in their graduate education.
And  we  are  looking  at  that  as  universities,  but  one  of  the  things
that  has  happened  in  the  polymer  industry  that  we,  as  an  ERC
[Engineering  Research  Center]  and  the  polymer  industry,  now  are
facing  is  central  research  at  the  polymer  industries  that  was
downsized because of globalization. And that is a void that now ex-
ists in commercialization. And the government and the universities
really need to think about how that void can be replaced. And that
is  something  that  our  center  is  actually  thinking  about  right  now.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Dr.  Cassady,  anything  to  add  there  from  your

perspective?

Dr. CASSADY. Well, I think it is interesting to look at this indus-
try  and  maybe  compare  it  a  little  bit  to  the  biotech  industry  that
developed.  And  I  think  that  you  really  have  two  types  of  corpora-
tions  that  are  moving  into  these  fields.  You  have  the  GEs,  the
major,  large  corporations,  but  you  also  have  a  lot  of  start-up  com-
panies.  I  think  if  you  look  worldwide,  and  this  is  based  on  data,
that probably about half of the start-up companies in this area are
in the United States. So we are not doing too badly in terms of get-
ting  the  companies  to  that  stage.  But  if  you  actually  look,  govern-
ment  investment  is  as  much  in  this  area  as  corporate  investment.
So  I  think  that  there  is  a  problem  there  in  getting  the  600  start-
up  companies  into  a  stage  where  they  can  develop  through  invest-
ments.  So  to  me,  I  think  gap  funding  is  important.  At  the  univer-
sity  level,  I  think  it  is  important  to  be  able  to  protect  intellectual
property. One of the things that we don’t have at the university is
a  way  to  operate  like  a  business.  For  example,  we  have  a  lot  of
good  ideas  and  innovations  and  intellectual  property,  but  how  do
we  pay  to  get  those  protected?  And  then  once  you  have  a—I  guess
I  would  call  it  almost  an  idea  for  a  product,  how  do  you  get  it
through that gap so you can actually develop it into a product? And
that needs investment.

So  I  think  that  those  are  areas  that  need  to  be  looked  at.  If  you
really  want  to  talk  about  getting  the  innovation,  especially  out  of
our  universities,  into  something  that  becomes  a  product  or  a  com-
pany. I think there are only six nanotech companies out of the 600
in  the  United  States  that  have  received  a  second  round  of  venture
capital funding. And that, to me, is pretty limiting.

Chairman INGLIS. Thank you.
I am happy to recognize Ms. Hooley.
Ms. HOOLEY. I want to yield to Mr. Honda for a follow-up.
Mr. HONDA. Thank you very much.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

The comments to—the answers to the question of the Chair were
very intriguing to me, and I have been reading through your testi-
monies,  and  it  seems  like  there  is  one  conclusion  I  come  to  on  the
question  of  what  role  the  Federal  Government  has  in  commer-
cialization.  I  think  I  heard  Dr.  Cassady  say  that  we  need  to  have
gap funding. I hear other folks saying that there is a role—definite
role  of  Federal  Government  in  bridging  the  ‘‘Valley  of  Death’’  so
that research can reach commercialization in this area. This is not
a  nano  industry.  It  is  a  nanoscale  activity,  which  is  an  enabling
technology.

And  so  my  question  is,  given  the  kinds  of  things  that  are  going
on  today,  and  from  your  point  of  view,  what  is  the  further  role—
or what is an additional role that the Federal Government can play
that  may  be  considered  by  some  folks  in  the  Federal  Government
as  corporate  welfare?  But  it  seems  to  me  that  we—in  this  new
arena  of  nanoscale  activities,  that  the  Federal  Government  has  a
critical  role  to  play  with  universities,  start-ups,  and  established
corporations to be able to help and assist in bridging this gap until
we  have  reached  that  critical  point  where  private  investors  can
come  in  with  some  confidence  and  support  commercialization.  Is
there a comment from any one of the four of you? And perhaps we
could  start  with  Dr.  Cassady  and  then  work  to  Dr.  Kennedy
and——

Dr.  CASSADY.  In  the  discussions  that  we  have  been  having,  one
of the points that was made is that we need, and to be really frank
with  you,  this  is  a  new  terminology  to  me,  but  what  the  military
calls ‘‘6.2 funding.’’ It is DARPA type funding. And I think that the
people at ONAMI feel like that there is a need for this sort of fund-
ing for this area. And again, I think that there is a role of govern-
ment.  And  I  know  in  some  of  the  current  discussions  at  the  state
level  in  Oregon,  there  is  an  issue  that  is  being  raised  with  regard
to  trying  to  attract  more  venture  capital  into  this  area.  So  part  of
it is that. We have a fairly good environment in Oregon.

Mr.  HONDA.  But  what  I  am  hearing  you  say  is  that  there  is  a

model out there that it should be applied to——

Dr. CASSADY. There may be a model, I think, that you could look

at.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  in  spite  of  the  fact  that  a  lot  of  pressure  is
being  put  on  states  that  the  Federal  Government  still  has  a  role?
Dr.  CASSADY.  I—you  know,  I  would  add  another  piece  to  it,  be-
cause  I  think,  you  know,  the  collaboration  between  federal  and
state is going to be needed in order to optimize this approach.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  to  the  Chair.  Would  this  enhance  our  competi-

tive edge globally?

Dr. CASSADY. I would think so.
Mr.  HONDA.  I  just  needed  an  opinion  from  the  field,  that  is  all.

Perhaps the others have some more comments.

Dr.  KENNEDY.  I  would  like  to  reiterate  some  of  my  comments
that  the  NASA  activity  25  years  ago,  we  had  done  a  tremendous
amount  of  research  on  composite  materials.  And  the  push  that
NASA  provided  and  DOD  provided  by  developing  components  for
aircraft,  such  as  wing  flaps  and  wing  boxes,  really  helped  the  in-
dustry.  It  pushed  the  industry  to  develop  that  technology.  I  think
that  is  an  important  step  that  the  Federal  Government—and  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

for——

is  consistent  with  the  comment  you  heard  on  DARPA.  So  DOD,
NASA,  Department  of  Energy,  those  are  some  wonderful  places
where  demonstration  programs  could  benefit  nanotechnology  I
think.

Mr.  HONDA.  I  appreciate  your  patience.  What  you  are  talking
about  is  basically  a  paradigm  shift  in  how  we  do  things,  and  this
composite  research  took,  what,  20  or  25  years  to  get  to  the  point
of commercialization? Is that something that the private sector can
afford to do, given the time?

I know the answer is no. The Federal Government—what you are

saying is that has a critical role in helping to bridge this end.

Dr. KENNEDY. Well, the Federal Government funded that activity

Mr. HONDA. Right.
Dr. KENNEDY.—a very long period of time. But now what you are
seeing  now  is  aircraft  that  are  having  50  percent,  or  a  large  frac-
tion  of  their  structure,  made  out  of  composite  materials,  and  it
just—it  takes  a  while  for  the  industry  to  develop  the  confidence  to
put  something  on  an  airplane  where  you  have—where  there  is  po-
tential for disaster. So there are a lot of issues there.

Mr.  HONDA.  And  the  composite  has  been  applied  to  the  tail  sec-
tion  of  our  commercial  jets  now.  It  is  stronger,  lighter,  and  more
reliable.  And  this  could  be  applied  to,  say,  launching  of  satellites
that could be lighter and stronger and carry a heavier payload and
things like that.

Dr.  KENNEDY.  And  that  is  where  nanotechnology—those  are  op-

portunities for nanotechnology, I think.

Mr. HONDA. Thank you.
Chairman  INGLIS.  Mr.  McCaul  is  going  to  be  recognized,  but  he
is  going  to  come  and  take  the  Chair  for  a  moment  while  I  run  to
a vote in the Judiciary Committee.

So Mr. McCaul and the Chair.
Ms. HOOLEY. He came a long way.
Mr. MCCAUL. [Presiding.] Yeah, I appreciate the promotion from

being just a lowly freshman to the Chair of the Subcommittee.

My  District  is  from  Austin,  Texas  to  Houston.  I  have  got  high
tech on either end. I have Dell, Samsung, Applied Materials. I also
have the University of Texas, and so I have the research and devel-
opment  arm  of  the  university.  And  I  am  very  interested  in  this
issue  of  nanotechnology  as  it  applies  to  what  I  view  as  really  a
great  partnership  between  industry  and  the  universities.  We  have
a  lot  of  scientists  at  the  universities  that  are  interested  in  this
partnership. I think it is good for industry as well.

So I wanted to see, first, if you would comment on that, and then
specifically, if you could discuss two issues. One is computer models
being funded by NSF. I know that with the UT system that is very
important  with  respect  to  nanotechnology.  And  then,  second,  in
terms  of  the  industry’s  collaboration,  there  is  always  the  issue  of
intellectual  property  management  and  how  they  can  properly  pro-
tect intellectual property.

So I know I am throwing a lot out there, but if—just to the panel

as a whole, if you would comment on that.

Mr.  FANCHER.  Well,  I  will  take  a  stab  at  the  modeling,  if  you

would like.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

I  think  it  is  important.  You  know,  a  science  is  a  science,  while
it is limited to just an experiment, you get one data point, and you
don’t really have predictability in it if you change variables in that
experiment, which is what is required for a manufacturing process.
So once you have more predictability, it is just to turn into a tech-
nology.  And  that  modeling  is  really  a  precursor  or  a  critical  event
that has to happen in manufacturing so that you can start to have
the  confidence  to  control  that  production  process  to  know  that  as
you are changing your inputs a certain way, what the outcome will
be.

So that would be my—so yes, it is critically important.
Dr. CASSADY. I will take a stab at the intellectual property.
I think that each institution is different, but I know at our insti-
tution, we have—and I would guess that probably the other Oregon
institutions,  we  have  to  look  at  our  process.  I  made  the  comment
that  we  have  to  make  it  easier  to  do  business  with  the  university.
And  that  is  one  of  those  barriers  that  occurs  if  you  have  too  many
steps in the process to approve these transfers of intellectual prop-
erty and licensing.

The  second  thing  is  partnerships.  I  think  that  we  have  to  find
a  way  to  make  these  work,  and  I  like  the  idea  of  trying  different
models  around  the  country  and  then  learning  from  one  another  as
to what works and what doesn’t work. And I think our experiment
is going to be very interesting.

I come from a background that was involved in—where NIH Na-
tional  Cancer  Institute  funds  partnerships,  inter-institutional,  and
always  involving  a  pharma  partner  in  what  they  call  ‘‘national  co-
operative  drug  discovery  programs.’’  The  bottom  line,  you  want
drugs,  you  want  NDAs,  and  you  want  drugs  going  on  the  market.
And I think those types of partnerships are excellent, and they are
excellent places for students to learn.

Dr.  KENNEDY.  I  would  like  to  comment  both  on  the  intellectual

property issue and on modeling, but I will pick modeling first.

Our  engineering  research  center  was  funded  based  on  modeling.
It  was  our  view  that  we  could  help  the  fiber  and  film  industry
transform  from  a  trial-and-error  industry  to  a  predictive  industry,
but  that  would  require  that  we  do  modeling  at  both  a  core  scale,
which  we  call  a  continuum  scale,  and  at  the  molecular  level.  And
we are doing that now.

But  let  me  point  out  the  kinds  of  advances  that  we  have  made.
The initial algorithms that we were using to compute at the molec-
ular  level  were  indicating  that  to  get  an  answer,  it  would  take
thousands  of  years,  105 years.  We  have  modified  those  algorithms
to  the  point  where  we  can  get  that  answer  in  several  hours.  That
is  a  major  advancement.  But  it  still  takes  powerful  computers  and
excellent  computer  infrastructure  to  do  that.  So  we  are  making
progress, and we are training students to use modeling in the fiber
and film industry.

Concerning intellectual property, I heard a woman from the Dow
Company  talk  about  their  interaction  with  universities.  And  she
pointed  out  that  universities  need  flexibility  in  the  way  they  ap-
proach  intellectual  property,  and  she  was  saying  that  it  had  been
their  experience  that  universities  were  very  rigid  in  that  regard
and so much so that Dow was starting to utilize industries in other

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

countries.  Particularly,  they  are  going  to  Europe  to  get  research
done.  It  says  that  the  universities  really  need  to  take  a  hard  look
at  that,  and  I  think  that  has  been  suggested  here.  And  it  is  some-
thing that we need to do.

Thank you.
Mr.  DONNELLY.  I  would  comment  on  the  modeling  side.  This  is
very  important.  It  has  been  important  for  many  years  in  terms  of,
first,  gaining  a  better  understanding  of  what  is  going  on.  And  in
terms  of  the  cycle  times  for  material  systems,  you  reference  the
composites that took 25 years.

This is quite common in any material system, nano or otherwise.
The  cycles  are  very,  very  long,  and  utilizing  modeling  to  under-
stand  better  what  is  going  on  and  reduce  the  number  of  experi-
ments  is  very  important,  especially  as  you  get  to  the  nano  level.
The degree to which you can experiment and truly understand the
material  behaviors  is  very,  very  difficult  without  augmenting  that
with a good modeling program. And so that is very important.

IP  from  an  initial  standpoint,  I  can  echo  the  Dow  position  as  it
has been articulated. Frankly, it is an enormous barrier to working
with  universities.  I  would  say  there  is  a  great  deal  of  variability.
Some universities are very good to work with in this regard. Others
are  on  the  other  end  of  the  spectrum  and  virtually  impossible  to
work  with.  And  so  it  can  be  a  significant  barrier.  The  need  to  in-
vest  a  great  deal  of  funding  over  a  long  time  and  not  have  good
IP terms and exclusivity, in many cases, frankly, just leaves indus-
try  to  have  to  walk  away  and  look  other  places  for  this  capability,
because having that intellectual property ownership is very impor-
tant commercially. You really can’t do it without it.

Mr. MCCAUL. Well, thank you.
And  of  course  any  suggestions  to  enhance  that  industry-univer-
sity relationship, I think the universities, to be competitive, sort of
need  to  get  with  the  program,  so  to  speak,  and  start  working.  I
think  some  have  worked  very  effectively,  and  Dr.  Kennedy,  I  was
actually  concerned  to  hear  that  some  were  not,  but  I  think  it  is  a
great partnership for America.

So the Chair recognizes the Ranking Member.
Ms.  HOOLEY.  I  didn’t  realize  I  was  giving  away  all  of  my  time
to  Mr.  Honda,  but  that  is  okay.  I  thought  you  were  going  to  ask
him a short question.

I am going to ask just a couple of very—I had some specific ques-
tions, but many of them have been asked—some very general ques-
tions.  One  is  if  there  was  one  thing  that  we,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment, could do differently that would help us really be at the head
of  the  class  in  terms  of  global  competition,  what  would  it  be?  And
I  will  just  start  at  one  end  with  Mr.  Donnelly  and  go  to  the  other
end.

Mr.  DONNELLY.  I  think  if  you  will  look  in—and  this  was—I  re-
ferred  to  it  a  little  bit  earlier  in  the  question  by  Mr.  Honda,  but
when  you 
think  about  new  material  sciences,  of  which
nanotechnology is sort of the central theme of that right now, these
are  technologies  that  can  bring  a  lot  to  new  applications.  That  is
how we have to look at it. At the end of the day, we are not doing
nano because nano is something to do, but because we want to im-
prove performance characteristics of some end application. It could

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

be  an  aircraft  engine.  It  could  be  a  medical  scanner.  Any  number
of different things.

Where  the  Federal  Government  can  play  an  important  role  in
that is more funding in the early stages of science and much more
focused  on  the  ‘‘R’’  side  of  R&D.  References  were  made  to  NASA
and  a  number  of  other  military  application  programs.  That  money
that  is—you  know,  whether  it  is  6.2  money  and  things  of  that
genre  are  really  where  that  kind  of  research  activity  goes  on  for
many  years  before  you  really  get  the  technology  insertion.  And
there are plenty of applications across our military and NASA and
NIH  where  we  have  challenges  in  terms  of  things  we  want  to
achieve in new areas where new material science is ultimately the
answer  to  that,  but  they  are  things  that  need  to  be  nurtured  for
a  number  of  years  to  really  put  money  into  that  science  side  of  it
before you are going to see that in the end application.

Ms.  HOOLEY.  Okay.  So  you  would  say  more  money  into  the  re-

search side?

Mr.  DONNELLY.  More  money  into  the  research  side,  more  money
into  the  6.2s,  more  money  into  the  real  challenges  we  have  in
NASA and DOE and DOD and areas like that.

Ms. HOOLEY. Dr. Kennedy.
Dr.  KENNEDY.  More  money  is  always  wonderful,  but  I  think  we
have also got to look at workforce, very definitely. And when I say
workforce, I think we have got to back up into the public education
system  and  figure  out  ways  to  excite  pre-college  students  about
science,  mathematics,  and  engineering.  We  graduate  56,000,  I
heard,  engineers  a  year,  and  China’s  goal  is  to  graduate  a  million
engineers  a  year.  Well,  the  competition—you  see  where  the—they
are  great  minds.  So  we  really  need  to  reach  out  and  involve  other
people  in  science  and  technology,  and  the  Federal  Government
needs  to  think  about  that.  And  they  are  doing  that.  We  have  out-
reach  programs  that  we  participate  in,  NASA  does,  but  we  have
really got to continue to push hard on that, I think.

Ms. HOOLEY. Dr. Cassady.
Dr.  CASSADY.  Well,  I  certainly  agree  with  both  of  those  conclu-
sions. I guess that my feeling is that something that would encour-
age  the  relationships  between  research  teams  in  the  research  uni-
versities  and  these  start-up  companies  in  this  industry  that  don’t
really have the R&D funding, I think that, to me, is a place where
you  could  have  a  big  impact.  You  know,  there  is  something  wrong
when you have 600 start-up companies, only 10 percent of those got
a  first  round  of  venture  capital  funding,  and  only  10  percent  of
those got a second round. So you really have a big gap there.

The  other  point  I  would  make  is  in  terms  of  the  workforce.  Are
there some issues that I think surround some of our concerns about
national  security  that  could  have  a  big  modulating  effect  on  our
ability  to  attract  graduate  students,  international  graduate  stu-
dents?  Now  I  am  very  concerned  about  that.  So  I  think  if,  you
know,  we  don’t  want  to  have  a  double-edged  sword  where  all  of  a
sudden  they  are  gearing  up,  which  they  are,  and  then  we  make  it
less  available  because  of  certain  regulations  that  may  be  placed.  I
am  thinking  in  terms  of  export  control,  for  example,  as  an  area
where we are seeing a potential really big impact on our ability to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

bring graduate students in from certain places and have them work
as part of these teams.

Those are a couple thoughts that I would have.
Ms. HOOLEY. Before we go to Mr. Fancher, I want to ask a ques-

tion.

Is  there  the—being  able  to  bring  in  graduate  students  or  college
students  from  other  countries,  is  that  a  big  problem  for  other  uni-
versities? No?

Dr.  CASSADY.  Well,  I  am  talking  about  a  potential  problem  and

the potential impact of export controls.

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Dr. CASSADY. For example, where we may be actually in a situa-
tion  where  we  have  to  get  students  from  certain  places  licensed  to
be  able  to  have  access  to  certain  equipment  to  do  their  research.

Ms. HOOLEY. Okay. Okay.
Dr.  CASSADY.  And  if  you  do  that,  and  I  am  not  saying  that  we
have gotten to the point where it has been done, but if you do that,
I  think  it  will  have  an  impact  on  where  students  decide  to  come
and do their graduate work.

Mr. FANCHER. Finally, I would say you are probably beginning to
observe several states have entered the game of nanotechnology in
a,  I  think,  very  complementary  way  to  federal  investments.  But  I
think  what  you  also  are  seeing  is  that  there  is  a—I  kind  of  am
complementary  to  Scott’s  comments  about  focusing  just  on  re-
search. I think that it is time to begin focusing on the development
and  early  manufacturing  that  the  nanotechnology  has  come  out  of
the  lab  and  it  is  now  ready  to  go  into  commercialization.  And  our
competition  is  focusing  their  investments  heavily  in  what  I  would
call  ‘‘next  generation  Bell  labs.’’  PCAST  noted  that  in  their  study
back  in  2003.  There  is  a—the  cost  is  daunting  to  commercialize
nanotechnology.  It  is  increasing  exponentially.  We  are  producing
lots of wonderful research, but to capture the economic rewards re-
quires  a  focus  on  supply  chain,  getting  your  partners,  leveraging
the resources from the states, leveraging the resources from compa-
nies,  industry  to  tackle  that.  And  I  think  other—competition  is
doing  that,  and  if  we  just  look  at  the  number  of  papers  that  are
published, what you are going to be focused on is the success in the
research,  but  we  are  not  going  to  be  fully  realizing  the  benefits  of
development  and  manufacturing  for  homeland  security,  defense,
and all of our other economic security.

Ms. HOOLEY. All I know is having visited ONAMI and not having
quite  the  wonderful  floor  space  that  you  have  in—facility  that  you
have  in  New  York,  that  a  couple  of  the  products  that  have  been—
are in the stage of being developed really make a difference in peo-
ple’s  lives.  I  mean,  it  is  amazing  what  nanotechnology  can  do  and
really  transforming  how  people  live.  And  so  it  is—I  mean,  I  think
it  is  really  important  work  you  are  doing,  and  I  like  the  partner-
ships. And if you would—please, if you have any suggestions about
what we can do and what we can do better, let us know.

Thank you so much for taking your time to be here today.
Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Ms. Hooley.
I will recognize myself for another round of questions here.
Mr.  Fancher,  it  was  very  interesting  to  hear  you  talk  about
hands-on  kind  of  learning,  I  think,  in  one  of  your  slides.  And  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

engineering  statistics  that  you  cited  are  of  great  concern  to  us  on
this  committee,  and  we  have  talked  about  it  a  number  of  times
here.  And  it  seems  to  me,  as  a  lure,  that  one  of  the  things  that
would  make  engineering  more  interesting  is  if  it  is,  as  much  as
possible, hands-on education, so that it is not an abstract principle,
but  rather  something  that,  ‘‘Oh,  I  can  see  how  that  might  work.’’
And  if  you  can  see  it,  then  it  is  an  exciting  thing  to  study.  Like
the  law  has  stories  that  it  tells  in  its  cases.  It  is  interesting  to
study law, because they are about people and they are about cases
and  they  are  about  situations.  If  you  make  engineering  that  inter-
esting, then hopefully we will keep a lot of students going at it.

Another  thing  I  wanted  to  comment  on  is  the—I  think  I  have
heard  comments  on  collaboration  both  in  Mr.  Fancher’s  testimony,
and  I  wanted  to  congratulate  Dr.  Kennedy  on  what  Clemson  is
doing.  It  really  is  significant,  I  think,  that  Clemson  University  is
teaming  with  MIT.  That  is  obviously  significant,  and  with  Clark
Atlanta  University.  That  is  an  exciting  thing  that  you  realize  that
your commitment to diversity and to expanding this—opportunities
for  engineering  education  from  MIT  north  of  you  to  Clark  Atlanta
University  south  of  you,  and  so  I  wanted  to  congratulate  you  on
that.

that  are  new 

the—those  of  us 

this
nanotechnology get very excited about it. But help me to figure out
the  difference  between  what  we  should  be  expecting  here  and  the
hype. We have to be careful, I suppose, those of us that are novices
at this, not to be carried away and think that we have found a per-
petual  motion  machine  or  something  like  that  and  go  running  out
and  tell  everybody  to  buy  heavy  in  those  areas.  So  does  somebody
want to help me figure out the distinction between the reality and
the hype?

Mr.  FANCHER.  Well,  I  will  take  a  stab,  not  to  miss  out  on  that

Now  what 

is 

to 

opportunity.

I think the hype a lot of times is what is often described as ‘‘bot-
tom up nanotechnology.’’ And it is the concept of basically creating
something molecule by molecule exactly the way you want it. Think
of  it  as  a  statue  from  the  inside  out.  The  more  closer  to  commer-
cialization,  though,  is  the  top-down  approach  where  you  are  inte-
grating  nanotechnology  in  incremental  ways.  And  I  would  give  an
example.  Maybe  you  are  familiar  with  microsystems  or  MEMS.
Okay.  Well,  game-changing  performance  improvements  can  be
made  or  captured  by  integrating  nano-materials  onto  these  micro-
structures.  So  it  is  the—it  is  an  incremental  process,  or  an  evo-
lution  of  nanotechnology  versus  there  are  isolated  examples  of  the
revolutionary  impact  of  nanotechnology.  For  example,  the  clothes
that  don’t  absorb  dirt.  You  know,  there  are  a  few,  but  those  will
be fewer and far between. The other wins, I think, are going to be
an incremental evolution. And the reason for that is that your sup-
ply  chain—you  know,  just  because  you  invent  something,  I  mean,
doesn’t—you  have  to  bring  the  whole  supply  chain  along  with  you
before  it  goes  into  production.  The  tool  suppliers,  materials,  the
chemistries. And it is one thing to make just one device. It is quite
a completely different challenge to make a high-yield, low-cost pro-
duction  flow  for  that.  It  is  a  completely  different  challenge.  And  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

think  that  is  my—I  hope  that  I—you  know,  at  least  from  our  per-
spective would kind of——

Chairman  INGLIS.  That  is  helpful.  And  Mr.  Donnelly,  something
that you mentioned is interesting. You said R&D, we should really
be  focusing  on  the  ‘‘R’’  part  of  that  in  government.  And  yesterday,
I was with some folks from General Motors, and that is really what
they  were  saying  about  hydrogen,  that  we  really  need  for  the  gov-
ernment to be taking risk in the ‘‘R’’ part, I suppose, in your termi-
nology, and leaving to companies like yours and General Motors to
pick  up  from  that.  But  tell  me  how  you  see  that  ‘‘R’’  part,  the  risk
taking  in  the  research  area.  I  mean,  that  is,  I  assume,  what  you
would say is what government has to do is take the risk in the re-
search.

Mr.  DONNELLY.  I  think  that  is  true.  And  not  the  sole  responsi-
bility,  obviously.  Companies  like  ourselves  are  investing  in  the
basic  research,  and  we  will  continue  to  do  that.  But  I  think  what
happens, if you look at the government and willingness to take risk
is  to  provide  some  early  application  opportunities  for  these  tech-
nologies.  I  think  one  of  the  challenges  in  nanotechnology  and  for
people  to  understand  nanotechnology  and  sort  of  what  is  involved
in  this  process  is,  perhaps,  more  difficult  than  a  lot  of  other  tech-
nologies we have talked about, because if people are expecting that,
you  know,  some  day,  whether  it  is  a  year  or  10  years  from  now,
you wake up and start buying nanotechnology products, people are
really confused. I don’t know what a nanotechnology product would
be.  Where  the  nanotechnology  is  going  to  be,  it  is  truly  enabling
technology. So whether you are talking about enabling a technology
that would allow more highly efficient ways to convert water to hy-
drogen,  to  enable  the  hydrogen  infrastructure,  or  whether  you  are
talking  about  an  aircraft  engine  that  gets,  you  know,  better  fuel
economy  because  you  can  fire  at  a  higher  combustion  temperature
because  of  a  nano-alloy  and  a  high-pressure  turbine  blade,  the
places  where  the  technology  is  going  to  make  an  impact,  it  is  not
going  to  be  terribly  obvious.  And  99.9,  probably,  out  of  100  people
in  this  country  will  never  understand  or  know  there 
is
nanotechnology in the product they are buying. It is the change in
that  technology  that  is  enabling  that  better  performance  or  that
higher  reliability  that  is  how  the  impact  of  nanotechnology  mani-
fests  itself.  And  so  it  is  hard,  really,  to  go  to  the  public  and  say,
‘‘This  is  what  nanotechnology  is,’’  because  it  is  many  different
things,  and  it  is  going  to  manifest  itself  not  as  a  nano-product  but
as something in a bigger product, everything from a semiconductor
chip  that  runs  at  a  higher  speed  or  higher  transistor  densities  to
an aircraft engine turbine blade.

So  I  think  when  you  look  at  what  the  government  role  can  be,
and why I say to focus on the ‘‘R’’ side is that historically, the gov-
ernment  applications,  whether  they  be  for  security  purposes  or
military  purposes  or  energy  infrastructure  purposes,  can  have
these  challenges  that  can  be  solved  by  new  material  systems.  And
that is where I think the government can take those risks in those
early  applications  and  allow  the  technology  to  mature  before  it
shows in the commercial sector.
Chairman INGLIS. Thank you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

My time has expired, and I would recognize Ms. Hooley for a sec-

ond round of questions.

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you.
Mr.  Donnelly,  I  am  going  to  ask  you  this  question,  and  then  the

rest of you can answer it afterwards.

Bridging 

the  gap  between  research—basic  research  and
nanotechnology  commercialization,  as  you  have  just  explained,  is
an enormous challenge.

The  Advanced  Technology  Program  at  the  Department  of  Com-
merce was designed to address this transition problem. And it cur-
rently supports projects in the nanotechnology area. Do you, or any
of  you,  believe—or  have  had  experience  with  this  program,  and  if
so, do you believe it is valuable and deserving to be continued—the
support continued for it?

Mr.  DONNELLY.  Well,  I  am  familiar  with  the  NIST  programs.  I
probably  should  preface  by  saying  I  am  on  the  NIST  Advisory
Board,  and  so  I  am—or  the  ATP  program,  and  so  I  am  familiar
with their programs.
Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Mr. DONNELLY. And I think they do have value. They do encour-
age promotion of very novel, early-on technologies and promote the
interaction,  frankly,  in  many  cases,  between  companies  both  large
and  small  and  universities  and  other  small  companies.  And  so  I
think  that  is  an  area  on  the  research  side  where  it  has  provided
some funding to develop some novel technologies in clearly what is
a pre-commercialization state. And so it is not necessarily targeted
at  an  application  that  is  DOE  related  or  DOD  or  NIH  related  but
really  provides  an  avenue  that  historically  will  fund  some  very
early  technology,  pre-commercialization,  and  does  promote  what  I
would  kind  of  refer  to  as  some  ‘‘R’’  funding  well  before  you  know
where  that  application  is  going  to  go  and  where  the  development
phase will go.

Ms. HOOLEY. Do you think it has been successful?
Mr.  DONNELLY.  I  think  it  has  been  largely  successful.  Again,  it
is a case of the government taking some risk and investing in some
early technologies, and so you certainly would look at some of those
programs  and  say,  ‘‘Nothing  came  of  it.’’  That  is  truly  the  nature
of research.

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Mr.  DONNELLY.  And  we  have  to  look  at  that  as  well.  We  invest
in many things that don’t happen, but some of the things turn out
to  generate  some  technologies  to  become  very  commercially  impor-
tant.

Ms. HOOLEY. Do any of the rest of you have experience with that

program and—yeah, Dr. Kennedy?

Dr.  KENNEDY.  Yes,  ma’am.  We  have  been  very  interested  in  the
ATP  program  as  our  NSF  money  runs  away  and  goes  away  in  an-
other  three  years,  and  we  are  looking  for  supplemental  funding  to
keep our center running. And that is one of the places we will look
is at ATP with our industry partners, because we do have 20 indus-
try partners. So we are very positive about that program.

It is not a big program. It is only, what, $200 million to $300 mil-
lion,  I  believe,  so  it  is  not  really,  really  big,  and—but  I  think  it  is
a  good  idea.  We  have  attended  a  number  of  their  workshops,  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

so we are pretty positive about it, and we would like for it to stick
around.

Mr. FANCHER. I would also comment. I think the NIST ATP pro-
gram  is  extremely  effective.  And  the  reason  for  that  is  that  it  pro-
vides  for  the  integration  of  several  companies’  technologies  to
work—to be integrated together. It is the funding to allow for those
types  of  mid-range  programs  that  are  so  critical  to  commercializa-
tion.  So  it  is  really  pre-commercialization,  but  it  is—and  I  think
NIST  does  a  nice  job  of  focusing  on  taking—selecting  high-impact
opportunities,  things  that  are—you  know,  yes,  there  is  risk,  but  if
it  hits,  it  will  provide  a  broad  impact  on  a  variety  of  other  compa-
nies  that—for  example,  tool  development  or  something  like  that.
So——

Ms. HOOLEY. Dr. Cassady, any——
Dr. CASSADY. I am not that familiar with the ATP program.
Ms. HOOLEY. Okay.
Dr.  CASSADY.  But  SBIR  I  am  more  familiar  with.  I  think  that
that  also  plays  a  role  in  helping  with  early  stages  of  business  de-
velopment. And that has actually been a mechanism to help faculty
that  wish  to  do  this  actually  move  into  a  business  development
phase.  And  that  has  been  done  very  successfully  in  certain  areas,
and we just need to figure out how to make that process more effi-
cient. But that is another mechanism that helps fill that gap.

Mr. FANCHER. I think it is also important to note, venture capital

does not tread there. And everybody thinks——

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Mr.  FANCHER.—venture  capital  is  early.  No,  venture  capital——
Ms.  HOOLEY.  No,  venture  capital  wants  to  be  where  they  know

they are going to——

ready in place.

Mr.  FANCHER.  It  is  there  generally  where  there  is  production  al-

Ms. HOOLEY. Yeah.
Mr. FANCHER. There are sales, and they are ready to take it glob-

al or something. There is a lot of research——

Ms. HOOLEY. They are not risk-takers.
Mr.  FANCHER.  Yes.  There  is—a  majority  of  the  funding  is  in  the
research realm, very little in this development mid-range. And you
are seeing it from NIST ATP. DOD, when they need something for
the  battlefield,  they  will  fund  in  that  space.  And  then  Department
of  Energy,  also.  So  there  is—I  think  it  is  important  to  under-
stand—and  PCAST  mentioned  it.  Research  and  development  and
manufacturing,  they  are  two  pieces  of  it.  They  co-exist,  and  they
feed  back  and  forth.  And  that  is  back  to  the  workforce  training.
How  do  you  do  hands-on  workforce  training  if  you  are  only  in  the
lab?  You  do  work  for  hands-on  exposure,  because  you  have  got  ac-
tual,  real-life—this  is  what  your  work  environment  is  going  to  be.
This is what you are going to get, you know, to work in with these
kinds  of  tools  or  in  this  environment.  And  I  think  that  is  very  en-
gaging.  Particularly,  we  expose  kids  in  high  school,  even  the  voca-
tional  student  kids  are  being  brought  in  and  rotated  through.  And
in  fact,  our  region,  they  are  actually  pushing  forward  to  build  a
new  high-tech  vocational  school  focused  on  this,  and  it  really  cre-
ates, I think, an avenue, a strategy for engaging a restructuring of
the educational curriculum that is nano-centric, let us say.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Ms.  HOOLEY.  I  think  it  is  interesting  that  you  are  looking  at
high-tech  vocational  training,  because,  at  least  in  my  state,  when
I look in the newspaper and look in the help wanted ads, the num-
ber  of  jobs  tend  to  be  in  the  highly  skilled  area.  I  mean,  they  are
asking  for  not  particular  engineers,  but  highly  skilled  workers  in
a variety of things. And that seems to be where we are missing the
boat.  So  I  think  it  is  interesting  that  you  are  looking  at  high-tech
vocational programs.

Mr.  FANCHER.  Yeah.  Well,  if  you  were  to  look  at  a  chip  fab,  a
large chip fab, about 2,000 workers in it, about 20 percent of those
are  Ph.D.s  and  engineers.  The  80  percent  are  operators,  techni-
cians. You know. I mean, you can—they make very good money——

Ms. HOOLEY. Right.
Mr.  FANCHER.—fixing  these  tools  without  even  an  associates  de-
gree. You are global. You are in demand. I mean, it is a very excit-
ing  opportunity.  And  what  is  nice  is  that  there  is  a  whole  con-
tinuum  so  that  you  can  go  back  to  school.  There  is  a—it  is  a  nur-
turing—the  industry  provides—or  the  nanotechnology,  I  think,
promises  to  have  a  whole  continuum  of  opportunities  for  a  worker
to  pursue  lifelong  education  and  training  to  work  their  way  up
the—you  know,  the  pay  scale  and  the  technology  responsibility
scale.

Ms. HOOLEY. Thank you.
Chairman INGLIS. Thank you, Ms. Hooley.
Mr. Honda is recognized for a second round of questions.
Mr.  HONDA.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chair,  and  I  hear  a  bell  ringing,  so

I will be real quick.

I want to thank the Chair and Ranking Member for putting this
together.  And  the  four  of  you  have  made  today  really  a  day  well
worth living, because the kinds of things that you are sharing with
us  is  the  kind  of  information  that  we  need  to  hear  constantly,  be-
cause  there  seems  to  be  some—at  least  in  my  opinion,  some  foot-
dragging in this arena.

I  agree  that  we  have  to  do  a  lot  more  in  pre-high  school  edu-
cation  in  the  area  of  education  and  bringing  along  the  community
in  terms  of  they  are  being  critical  consumers  of  products  and  also
the idea of having ATP continue, which has been zeroed out.

And I guess—there doesn’t seem to be a disagreement also on the
role  of  government  in  bridging  the  gap.  My  question  would  be,
given that, how do you see us creating the solution set for the prob-
lems that you have described? And you know, with the short time,
I would love to have that in writing so that it would give us a little
bit more time to cogitate over the responses you may have, the so-
lution  sets  that  you  may  be  suggesting  from  both  the  corporate,  to
the university, to the research arena. And that would be something
that I would really love to have, because we are struggling here to
be able to address everything from ATP to funding the gap.

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Ranking  Member.  And  if  you

have an immediate response, I will take it.

Mr. FANCHER. I would love to take a shot at that.
Actually,  my  written  testimony,  at  the  very  end,  it  has  my  rec-

ommendations.

I  think,  just  as  in  the  past  four  years  of  the  nanotechnology  ini-
tiative,  investments  were  made  in  strategic  critical  research  infra-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

structure.  The  National  Labs,  for  example.  Significant  amounts  of
money  were  invested  in  the  National  Labs  in  key  areas  of
nanotechnology,  the  same  as  NNI  provided  for  key  research  at  a
variety  of  universities  around  the  country.  I  think  what  is  impor-
tant  to  understand  that—to  help  the  smaller  and  medium-sized
companies through the ‘‘Valley of Death,’’ you can try to do it grant
by  grant,  company  by  company,  but  you  end  up  with  winners  and
losers, and frankly you feel like you didn’t get your money’s worth.
I  think  what  is  important  is  to  begin  to  focus  on  focusing  the  in-
vestments in national resources. Ours, for example, is at—we view
ourselves  as  a  national  nanotechnology  resource.  It  is  $3  billion  of
investment there. To not leverage that for small and medium-sized
companies  in  a  variety  of  applications  is  a  huge  lost  opportunity.
The  same,  though,  for  rolling  production  of—in  polymers  and  fi-
bers.  There  are  different  challenges  there,  but  there  is  a  need  to
focus the investment in key integration points. I think PCAST calls
it  ‘‘innovation  clustering.’’  Now  it  is  not  to  say  that  all  of  the  jobs
happen  there.  It  is  that  middle  that—what  NIST  ATP  is  trying  to
do,  you  are  supporting  it  through  infrastructure,  and  that  lowers
the risk, lowers the cost for the companies to engage work together,
leverage  each  other’s  resources,  and  pull  their  resources  towards  a
common  end.  And  I  could  envision  having  centers  like  this  estab-
lished  around  the  country  in—focused  on  different  production  or
applications  for  nanotechnology,  depending  on  the  particular  area
and in—of advancement. Certainly Europe is doing it. Asia is doing
it.  If  we  don’t  do  it,  I  think  we  are  going  to  find  ourselves  losing
the economic rewards.

Dr.  CASSADY.  I  would  be  pleased  to  provide  further  responses
after  I  consult  with  colleagues,  but  I  think  the  idea,  and  the  idea
that  we  are  pursuing  at  Oregon  State,  is  very  similar,  that  is  cre-
ates centers of innovation. Our research universities are centers of
innovation, but find a way to create places where we can translate
that  out  in  a  way  that  is  more  than  rhetoric,  that—where  it  actu-
ally  occurs.  And  you  need  places  where  you  can  bring  these  teams
together  to  move  these  ideas  into  products  and  eventually  into
businesses.

Chairman INGLIS. The gentleman yields back.
And  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  coming.  As  you  hear,  we  have
got  votes  on  over  at  the  House  Chamber.  Thank  you  for  allowing
me  to  run  out  to  a  couple  of  votes  at  the  Judiciary  Committee.  As
you see, we get our good exercise around here.

And  I  very  much  want  to  thank  you  for  coming  to  share  your
thoughts. It has been a very helpful hearing for me, and I am sure
for others. And we look forward to working with you on these excit-
ing developments.

Thank you for coming.
[Whereupon, at 11:45 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(65)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

Responses by John M. Cassady, Vice President for Research, Oregon State University

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Questions submitted by Representative Dave G. Reichert
Q1. Under funding from the National Science Foundation and the Defense Advanced
Research  Projects  Agency,  researchers  at  Washington  State  University  in  my
state  are  using  nanotechnology  to  develop  new  energy  production  systems  based
on  piezoelectric  materials  and  nanotubes  for  energy  switching.  Although  such
technologies  have  significant  potential  for  security  and  consumer  applications,
development  of  the  technology  for  applications  can  be  expensive  and  time  con-
suming.

Q1a. What  role  could  national  laboratories  play  in  helping  move  significant  new
technologies enabled through nanotechnology from university research to appli-
cations?

A1a. I  believe  the  best  group  to  answer  this  would  be  our  national  laboratory  ad-
ministrators.  We  are  working  very  closely  with  PNNL  and  I  will  discuss  this  with
my counterpart there, Dr. Len Peters. Question is how they would view in-licensing.
The  partnerships  we  now  have  to  develop  joint  proposals  lead  to  access  to  support
that  academic  PIS  normally  do  not  have.  In  some  cases,  this  may  lead  to  develop-
ment.
Q1b. When  multiple  organizations,  all  of  which  are  funded  by  the  Federal  Govern-
ment,  are  involved  in  such  work,  how  can  the  universities  continue  to  receive
appropriate  credit  in  accordance  with  the  Bayh-Dole  Act  without  directly  li-
censing the technology to the national laboratories for further development?

A1b. These  relationships  are  framed  by  agreements  (MOUs)  that  address  issues  of
licensing,  commercialization  and  revenue  sharing.  That  is  if  you  mean  by  ‘‘appro-
priate  credit’’  licensing  income.  These  agreements  are  always  negotiated  up-front.
The  national  lab  might  have  first  right-of-refusal  on  licensing  the  technology  and
could be involved in further managing development.

These responses had input from Skip Rung, Director, ONAMI.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(67)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

STATEMENT OF BOB GREGG
EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT

FEI COMPANY

Chairman Inglis:

Thank you for providing the opportunity for us to express our observations on the

National Nanotechnology Initiative.

I  am  Bob  Gregg,  Executive  Vice  President  of  FEI  Company.  Our  corporate  head-
quarters  are  in  Oregon,  and  we  have  1,800  employees.  Our  association  with
nanotechnology  derives  from  the  tools  we  build  and  the  diverse  international  mar-
kets  and  customers  that  we  serve.  FEI  develops,  manufactures,  distributes,  and
services  transmission  and  scanning  electron  microscopes  and  dual  ion  and  electron
beam  tools.  Our  tools  enable  nanotechnology  by  allowing  materials  and  devices  to
be  observed  over  a  size  range  of  eleven  orders  of  magnitude.  The  tools  are  used  to
observe,  characterize,  manipulate,  and  modify  structures.  They  allow  human  vision
to  be  continuously  extended  from  the  naked  eye  to  the  macro-  and  micro-worlds,
down  to  the  meso-  and  the  nano-scale  and  below.  Because  of  the  existence  of  these
tools,  the  imaging  of  atoms  is  routine.  This  level  of  performance  capability  is  nec-
essary to further not only basic research, but also to enable industry to manufacture
at economic levels of yield. Our products are used worldwide in academia, institutes,
and  industries  for  research,  prototyping,  and  production.  FEI’s  designated  markets
are NanoElectronics, NanoBiology, and NanoResearch. Our sales revenues are even-
ly  distributed  among  the  Asian,  European  and  North  American  markets.  In  2004
our revenues approached $500 million.

We  have  been  selected  by  the  DOE  as  the  primary  contractor  on  the  TEAM
project which is intent on building the highest resolution electron microscope in the
world.  This  instrument  is  targeting  subatomic  resolution  levels  and  will  lead  to  a
new  generation  of  more  powerful  research  tools.  FEI  Company  is  also  actively  pur-
suing initiatives with government entities in the area of researching proteomics and
in technical education.

As  a  consequence  of  our  business  activities  that  are  on  the  forefront  of
nanotechnology developments, we believe that we can offer a unique global perspec-
tive  on  the  National  Nanotech  Initiative  and  its  impact  on  U.S.  economic  develop-
ment.

Our  comments  are  directed  at  actions  that  are  needed  to  stimulate  a  more  direct
connection  between  academic  science  research  and  the  economic  growth  of  the  Na-
tion.  The  task  is  to  prioritize  and  then  channel  the  basic  research  we  require  into
the  academic  research  community  in  order  for  U.S.  industry  to  meet  its  strategic
objectives. The need is for a structured and sustained dialogue between U.S. indus-
try  and  Government  research  policy  makers.  If  we  do  not  succeed  in  this,  the  U.S.
will  become  a  net  importer  of  foreign  nanotechnology-based  products  in  the  future
with  serious  negative  consequences  to  the  social  welfare  and  standard  of  living  of
all U.S. citizens.

We restrict our observations to the following points.

1. The announcement of the National Nanotech Initiative in the year 2000 had
the purpose of stimulating and directing science to create a platform for new
technologies  and,  by  implication,  a  basis  for  maintaining  economic  growth.
The  initiative  has  succeeded  admirably  in  revitalizing  U.S.  science.  It  has
also had the effect of catalyzing other nations and economic blocs to actively
compete for predominance in a future nanotechnology-based global economy.
The  U.S.  now  trails  government  investments  in  nanotechnology  in  Europe
and Japan. This impacts our potential for innovation and, in turn, threatens
our future economic growth.

2. Competitive government bodies appear to have taken a business approach in
positioning  themselves  for  future  success.  The  fundamental  difference  with
the  NNI  approach  is  that  other  governments  are  gearing  their  strategies  to
rapid  commercialization  of  nanotechnology.  The  objective  is  a  rapid  return-
on-investment. Their approach is to focus their efforts into specific industrial
enterprises  that  play  to  their  strengths  and  then  provide  direct  government
investment to industry to accelerate product time-to-market.

3. It can be argued that the commercialization of nanotechnology is made more
complex within the U.S. free-enterprise system, as there is no mechanism to
allow government to make direct investment into the industrial sectors.
The  current  options  for  industry  which  are  needed  to  embrace  scientific  re-
search at the nanoscale are:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

• To  finance  their  own  R&D.  The  trend  here  is  not  encouraging  as  there
is  a  shortage  of  skilled  manpower  within  the  U.S.,  and  companies  are
under  pressure  to  reduce  overhead.  The  predictable  result  is  either  a  re-
duction  in  the  level  of  research  or  stretching  the  available  R&D  budgets
by  transferring  operations  to  regions  where  talent  and  cost  savings  coin-
cide.
• To either identify (a) a scientific discovery at a university that has a com-
mercial  fit  and  negotiate  the  IP  rights  or  (b)  establish  piecemeal,  a  re-
search program with a given university department. For industry, this is
a  time-consuming,  arduous  task  and  difficult  to  sustain;  for  the  univer-
sity,  the  time  and  specific  nature  of  the  investigation  may  conflict  with
current  constraints-and-reward  system  within  the  academic  community.
• To  await  academic  business  spin-offs  financed  by  VCs  to  evolve  to  the

point of proof-of-concept and engage in acquisition activity.

Relative  to  the  process  of  direct  government  investment  to  industry,  these
routes  extend  the  time  needed  for  the  commercialization  of  nanotechnology
and  put  the  development  of  U.S.  nanotechnology-based  international  com-
merce at a disadvantage.

4. The  last  observation  is  that  the  U.S.  is  now  fighting  a  war  on  two  fronts.
The  obvious  one  is  that  against  terrorism;  the  unstated  one  is  the  battle  to
dominate  future  nanotechnology-based  industrial  markets.  The  costs  of  the
former are causing serious cuts in investment in the latter. As other nations
competing  with  the  U.S.  are  not  burdened  by  this  dilemma,  our  progress  is
again  impeded.  The  long-term  economic  impact  for  the  U.S.  at  this  point  in
a  new  era  of  technology  shift  could  be  major  and  is  probably  being  under-
estimated.

What can we do to improve our current situation?
We  note  that  research  and  development  do  not  earn  money—they  cost  money—
and  that  our  nation’s  wealth  and  prosperity  is  ultimately  driven  by  the  level  and
added value of our exports to other countries. Our economic growth is heavily influ-
enced  by  our  manufacturing  industry.  Our  options  to  improve  the  NNI  program
within  the  existing  national  constraints  are  very  limited  and  must  focus  on  using
the  basic  academic  research  resources  available  to  us  to  directly  contribute  to  eco-
nomic growth. We must create mechanisms to allow existing industrial sectors that
are now involved in building nanotechnology-based economies to communicate their
basic research needs to government. The dialogue should be structured to enable in-
dustry  to  directly  support  government  in  setting  priority  areas  and  in  creating  and
maintaining science/technology roadmaps.

In short, if the government is opposed to direct investment in industry to promote
economic growth, it must use its power and responsibility to focus the efforts of the
academic  research  community  to  support  U.S.  industry  in  competing  in  the  coming
nanotech-based economy.

The  government,  through  its  funding  agencies,  would  create  the  appropriate  in-
centives and conditions for funding. These programs would not only have the intent
of direct funding, but would also create an environment and the rewards to encour-
age  academic  research  as  a  team  effort  (nanotechnology  will  need  a  multidisci-
plinary  approach),  establish  clear  performance  guidelines  (already  a  reality  for  in-
dustrial-based research), and a tangible result (science directed to economic benefit).
We  perceive  that  the  original  National  Nanotechnology  Initiative  was  carefully
phrased, as the word ‘‘technology’’ implies an end product and thus some social/eco-
nomic  benefit.  The  current  reality  is,  however,  that  all  the  funding  is  directed  to
‘‘nanoscience,’’ and that while there is great promise of things to come, we have few
new  nanotechnology-based  products  in  the  public  domain.  This  leads  to  a  concern
that,  without  more  focus  and  evidence  of  progress,  there  could  be  either  a  public
or political backlash that would be detrimental to U.S. commerce.

We urge the Committee to take every action within its power and sphere of influ-
ence  to  accelerate  the  transition  from  academically  based  science  to  commercially
relevant technology.

We thank you for your attention.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

77

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

95

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

118

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

119

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:05 Oct 27, 2005 Jkt 021195 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\RES05\051805\21195 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

